Another Time Beyond

Lucifer



Introduction: 

Now as for the matters of attempting to edit and compile quickly all the books of The Diary of Lucifer of which this book is included, when all of those books were produced within a ten month period of the same year, has left a fairly difficult challenge for those who might offer aid in editing and removing the many repetitions in some of the books that have come from the transferring of the long and short proverbs from a different device to the device they were compiled on. As far as I can tell, there might be seven books in total, once the repetitions are removed, at least those which are not necessary, as some of the repetitions contain different proverbs, actually, and it is most often the oldest of these that is to be removed. The fact that the repetitions are not in chronological order means that the repetitions, at the time of writing this, are needing to be brought together and some removed. If this has delayed the official release of these books, it has not delayed what is called the 'beta' release of them, and the release was made of the majority of these books in unedited form, around the time of the passing of the comet, which was my decision. The realization of being faithful and wise in using capitalism in order to proliferate these books to the Earth, is what brought about a revelation and the prophecy in Zechariah was later consulted, and indeed there was another person mentioned there who was the fellow of God, according to one translation. As for the High-Priest, he was discovered while considering the father of equality and mercy and after this, I then consulted the book of Zechariah again, and understood that he was already mentioned, so that I gave more attention to the beginning chapters of Zechariah. Both Mars and the High-Priest came after the passing of the comet, that it had passed by Earth, and so I considered these things to be part of a second time of uninterrupted seeking of wisdom, and indeed I am not a prophet and have not prophesied.

(II)

As for the use of the name Saruman, it is because of the proximity of Tolkein to the truth, only he has told the opposite to such a degree, it almost seems strange, and yet it is more innocent that he has told the opposite of almost everything, and that he goes widely around the angel, prior to the writing of these books, and so, given that Tolkein's books have become such a great part of the Earth, at this time, and that a young man once called me Sara, I have had to relent to my own want, as if reluctantly, yet not, to use the name Saruman in some of these long and short proverbs, and if all the proverbs are read, for only Notes from Salem can be any type of good introduction, than it may be understood in what way this name has been used, and why. As for reading all of the books, it does in fact become necessary to read all of them, and I am also liking the idea of having the ability to search them easily, for there are many proverbs in them, and I, too, have lost track of all that is in them. I consider a time that might come when a person will mention something in the books, and they will know what they are referring to, and I will only have to pause and consider whether I wrote something, and which thing they are indeed referring to, and yet I will have to rely on what answer I have at the time, which is probably more to my liking. That being said, it is still early at the time of writing this, and as of yet there are not many, by the measure of books, who have indeed read the books, and I doubt there are any yet who have managed to read all of them.

(III)

Now as for Mars, the god of Zion, he or she who buys Jupiter, purchasing it for the good of Zion and the proliferation of truth and wisdom, there are indeed likely to be seven books in all of these books, at this time, if everything is compiled into average length books, and yet they may also be broken up into one-hundred page books for the quicker enjoyment and philosophical indulgence of those who are liking to buy them this way, and if there is desire to produce films, to dedicate designated towns and villages, to produce memberships and technologies, and all the other things that may be produced based on these books, it is the choice of Mars, who purchases the seven rings by purchasing Jupiter from Saturn, that he is able to then give the rings to all the people of the Earth, and he take all the profit from these things that are produced from the books, and the books themselves, according to the purchase. Now the High-Priest is the sun, and the other person, he or she is Mars, and I considered, perhaps the Lord did not forget about these people, for I discovered them in my meditations, and wondered who they were, and indeed found that they were in the book of Zechariah. Now I offer peace to all the Earth, and at the time of writing this, have still to discuss anything with who will be Mars. Both the High-Priest, who I call The Priest-King of Zion, and Mars, who I call, Mars, the god of Zion, were discovered in meditation, and I asked a similar of equivalent of, who is this person? For both of these were discovered in meditation and both after the time of the passing of the comet by Earth. Indeed it became that the god of Zion was Mars, and I had understood that he did good, because of capitalism, that these books should be proliferated and the wisdom of the seven rings of Saturn given to all the people of Earth, and that it was Jupiter, I understood that Mars was the purchaser of Jupiter. Now then, still what is greater than the sun that rises? For is the sun not actually greater than the angel at length, even though an angel is still higher than him? Now I later realized he, too, was in the book of Zechariah, and I had opened the seal of Zorrobabel, and yet did not consult the book of Zecheriah in the outpouring. Now there are indeed some harsh things in these books, and yet there are harsh things in the Old Testament, and even so in the New Testament, and the people understanding religious writings, scripture, even if not to be added to the Bible, are not an ignorant people as some pretend to be when grand-standing and playing the roles they play sometimes in our chaotic society in North America, where the angel has resided. For our people are not naive, or foolish, and understand the concept of religion, and spirituality, even if some false-liberal residue of the propoganda of the Bush W. Administration that was directed against Islam, has remained with the people and become part of the compiled ignorance of foolishness of a false-religion that is ultimately ignorant and beneath the abilities and understanding of the people. That our people should even raise an eye-brow, as the expression is, to anything violent that is mentioned in these books, seems actually unlikely, despite any theatre that might take place to further alienate our people from the insanity of the smallest portion of society, like the half of one out of a hundred. In essence the books are emerging much from the corner-stone, which is the Christ, who being incredibly wise, did not seem to come to be a preacher of wisdom, for he gave the corner-stone, and it seemed that he did not speak even one out of a thousand that he knew, and it is likely his wisdom was even greater, although he was truly human, and while on Earth, truly human, did not know everything, and was not all wise, as God is all wise, but fulfilled all to perfection, and being truly human.

The Diary of Lucifer: Another Time Beyond

Now as for the very mighty men of Eretz Chadrack, what can I do, and what can I say different, for if they do not believe, yet I can not do differently, for there is religion, and the Lord, and I must obey the Lord, that they are not blaspheming to pass through any shield of Mala, for they are attaining a special consideration with God, concerning the angel, for they have entered into Zion, and if they did not intend it, yet the Earth is the Lord's. Now what does wisdom say of this? But no mighty soldier may offer me training unless it is agreed upon, and I cannot say, yet receive training from me, and I train you, for it is abomination for me, and I would sin against myself, and I would commit wrong against myself, that it would be very foolish for me, that I revolt against it. Now only to David, or a very mighty man would I go, and only if there were many Midianites having seized much control of the land. Now to no other would I go. Now is the angel really feeble? But he is feeble and yet not feeble.
	Now as for the elected leader of the meeting place, only to him or her would I be right to speak, for the others are lesser than them who are elected, for if I go to them in person, it causes disruption, and they fall, as if to stumble and bow in cursing, because they fall and bow in stumbling, and it is because of the chaos and lack of order, but the elected leader, who is called Prime Minister, they do not stumble to speak to me in person, and they do not stumble and curse, for the people are wanting order, and business-people know it, that to not send someone at times, is foolishness, and it causes disruption, and cursing and bullying, and the angel is not capable to over-come the chaos of this time, that he commits error as others commit error, and yet it is good that all are trying, at least, within their ability, to be considerate concerning the angel, for their own sakes, and for the reputation of nations as it pertains of the future and history, for only good will come from good, that you are able to strategize well when you make decisions, and as for peaceful considerations, they are only resulting in good at all times. Now what does a king say? But in this circumstance, it is not right for me to go, and so I send a person who will be considered acceptable. Now the angel cannot do so, because of the lack of order, and it causes resentment, and the people are not pleased, and yet they too are not always capable to see that order is right, and the right things are regarded. Now the Lord has as if sexually harassed me, and yet it is not, for He created me, and yet no other may do so, and I have written things that only I have the right to, and for others it is not right, and not their place. Now the Lord is my father, and none other may do so.
	Now it comes from slaves, with women, who say, the Lord is wrong to disrespect me. But her who does so, is seeming confusing, for she speaks against herself, for the Lord created her from the rib of Adam, and a prostitute of the enemy has that of a slave with her, and yet the daughters of the Lord's, the Lord has created them, and He is their father, in Heaven, who is God, that He has made them beautiful, for He has given this to them. Now a woman is much regarding the Lord, this is a woman of beauty and precious, as a priceless stone, and there are many women upon the Earth, and they are not the same, and some are the devil's and others are having statues and are on land, and the woman who regards her beauty, is she not also regarding the Lord, in that she regards her beauty? Now women are regarding the Lord to be beautiful, when the Lord has given them beauty to be beautiful, that to her who is especially given beauty by the Lord, more so than most, is she not doing what is good, regarding the Lord, to be regarding her beauty? Now an angel is given what they are given, and are they not regarding the lord, to be regarding what they have been given? Now the Lord gives to one, the power to do war, and they are then respecting the Lord and doing well, to be regarding doing war when it is right, that they do well with what they are given by the Lord. Now to another, the Lord gives the power to lead, and are they not doing well to be regarding that they should be leading, that they do well with what they have been given by the lord? Now to another, he has given the power to be excellent and without envy in business, that they may prosper greatly and be great, and are they not doing well to be becoming very wealthy, that if they are moral, it is doing great good a thing of good morel for the Lord's people that they become very wealthy. Now to another, the power to be ambassador, to another, special wisdom with art, and to another, ability to defend and keep others with peace. But a lazy and wicked, he has hated God, and his soul says, I will not aid the kingdoms of the Lord, to be using what I have been given, and he buries what he has been given in the ground and places dirt over it, and he sits upon the ground, and is utterly lazy and stubborn to do anything, for he hates to aid the kingdom, and he has the understanding to know he will aid the kingdom if he does anything, and he sits in wickedness, and is wicked, and he is like the other who believes the leader's work is a conspiracy, that he looks with lack of truth, upon a leader's work, and says it is all just for evil and it is a conspiracy, and this man is like the other, and he is not wise in this, and he is not the same as the one who watches silently, skeptical at times, in case the flock must be protected, for this one believes in God, and the other is only wicked. Now if every thing of God has a thing of the devil, that the devil supplies foot for foot, shield for shield, than it should be known that these things, the Lord's and the devil's, are very different, and not close to each other, for they are very different in truth. Now if the Lord demands performance, from any, it is a great honour to that person, that the Lord demands it of him, that He is having to perform what He is given to perform on Earth, as his role. Now the devil has no right to demand anything on Earth and neither of his servants. Now regarding the obvious things is sufficient, and for those considered that they should have seen a representative instead of the person, that too is sufficient, and nothing more is required, only that all know how to be nice, which is to say, sufficiently polite, when it is required, and no more is required from this. 

Now let the Muslims know it, and the Japanese, and then, too, all other people, that where there is one who would torture the innocent, he or she is not even a sycophant, and it has nothing to do with who they would torture, for these are those who are part of the devil-cult, and is it is true in Mala, it is official, too, on Earth, for it is not hate, not jealousy, not envy, not wrath, for it has nothing to do with who they are against, but they are not against them, for they are a member of the devil-cult, and they are those who stand on the right hand side or left hand side of the devil, for they are zealous for his kingdom, to do that which pleases him, to do what would be most wicked and without cause or reason, in order to please the devil. Now these can be any person in any place, and they are scattered throughout the Earth, and there have been some in uniforms of good, and there have been some upon side-walks, asking, and there have been some in every place, and these are fully devoted in heart to the devil, loyal to him with their heart, mind, and soul, loving the devil and his kingdom, zealous to please him. Now their hearts worship the devil, and their hope is in him, the devil. Now they are even higher with the devil than those who would torture beautiful children, and they take pleasure from pleasing the devil in this sycophantic thing, and they are the less mighty than those who stand on either side of the devil, for these knell to the devil, and worship him and their hope is in him, and they take pleasure in the blood-shed of the lake of fire, to desecrate, as sycophants, what is pure and beautiful, that they worship the devil, and so those who are only liking to desecrate, and are sycophantic, this is not sexuality of any type, but it is an opposite thing from those upon land, for their hope is in the devil in this thing, and their loyalty is to them, that they worship the devil in these types of things. Now some Sodomites were these, for Sodom is the devil's, and Sodomites are sycophants, for to be a sycophant is not sexuality.

Now the lower prostitute to the brutal prostitute who bullies, if she slays with guile, to seduce a man to love that she might later betray him, seducing him much, she is also of the lake of fire, and getting the number of the beast, for she preys upon what is sacred to do wickedness, and she as those who torture a child who is beautiful, for she preys upon innocence of a person, and whether she drinks of blood-shed of innocence or not, a wine of the lake of fire, she receives the number of the beast if she does not already have it, and she is a person who is the devil's, and the brutal prostitute of the enemy, she is better than this prostitute.

Now the man who desires men, he is usually not righteous, and he is not righteous in this thing of fornication that a man should be with a man in terms of fornication. Now it is the Lord who makes higher or lower, better or worse, and none commit wrong, by their creator, who is God of the Universe, who does this thing, and for the atheist, none does wrong by the Universe, that does this thing, that it is by people. Now the man who desires men must be respecting society, respecting God, for if he transgresses in this thing, he is deserving to die, and much so, for he is abomination not known to a people who value integrity, or for any society that has been on Earth, for none tolerated them who did not respect society. Now all must be respecting society, and the respect of persons is another thing, of rebellious wickedness and unwanted respect, for the respect of persons opposes another with unwanted respect that it might rebel against a person, for this is the reason for the unwanted respect. Now without the rebellion against another, that is great, there is no respect of persons. Now again, all must be respecting society, for it is also the fear of God, and it is only respecting society to the atheist. Now do not even hear the grievance of the woman who is a pervert, for she is a prostitute of the enemy, feigning innocence, and as a moth in this thing, when she is saying, I am male, that she may then go beyond this, in order to bully and be wicked and perverse. Now I do not hate lesbians, or do not have anything against them, or judge them of wrong, and I am not the Lord, and yet if there is such a woman who bullies, to be as a stalker, or one who does not depart when they are asked, that they bully another woman who does not wish to be with them, or she bullies women with this thing, you who are male are having every right to be involved in this thing, for the Lord created them male and female, and they are for each other. Now as for lesbians, they are not wrong to me, and yet I am not the Lord.

Now if a Harrod who is a slave, for Harrod was a slave who should not have been king, is supporting the devil and the devil's people who are on Earth, it should be known, that he, too, is with the devil's kingdom.

Now the angel, too, is a satan, and Satan, the old Devil, is no longer an angel, and nor is his name Lucifer anymore.
	
Now bitter stones are not stones, rocks, mountain formations, mountains, but if they are Beelzebub, and he appears from the bitter stone, the bitter stones have been found hidden among stones and among soil. Now Beelzebub is arrogant in his kindness, when encouraging, and he is a brutal and mean old man when he is not encouraging people in the wrong direction. Now he has even been found among women, that this arrogance that encourages is encouraging and mocking, that it encourages in the wrong direction. Now does he not often encourage away from repentance, for he would wish to lose none.

Now the devil goes about as a lion or lioness, looking for whom he may devour, and this is not the same as a lion or lioness who is the Lord's.

Now a harmless volcanoe, that does not perform any wrong on land, carrying out any action, is that which indulges in the lake of fire, and if it is harmless, than it is good. Now the angel has even been a harmless volcano, and it is not the same as a mountain that is a king.

Now perform no wrong thing that the Lord will honour, for if the Lord honours it, to make it so with regards to Mala, to what is like a curse for you, to be so cursed, it is even more imprudent to do a wrong thing to yourself that the Lord will honour and make so in Mala, for if you circumcise yourself to Unich, and that by Mala, what will the Lord do? But I do not know. Now if you do not regard, and go beyond the limit, are you sometimes then being cut off to what measure you did not regard, for the sword cuts off the arm and it cuts off parts and it casts away riches and the Lord removes blessing. Now I do not write anything about combat and wickedness. But do not have lack of respect, because your heart knows you should bow, or stay back, that you have wrath against a person when they have done you no wrong, and you have no reason. Now better to be rebuked, and told not to bow, when it is an angel, than you should have wrath, because your heart says to you, bow, that you be angry and wrathful for no reason, and concealing your wrath, are incurring the judgment of God. Now it is God who judges you in this thing, and you are not supposed to bow to an angel, and Japanese people do so as a gesture, for they are not like fellow citizens who are passed on the street, but they are among the ranks of the angels, that they might bow as a gesture.

Now as for the mountain tribes, do not blaspheme the Lord to take their bows, for they are the type for hunting and it is their culture, for all the Lord's different people, who are all the people, their cultures must be respected in Eretz Chadrack, and yet the devil's people, they have no right to be on Earth, and they emerge from hell and return to hell. Now does not the devil wish to bring his kingdom upon Earth to establish it, whether it is Babylon as well, or only another kingdom of his? But indeed he wishes it, and yet his numbers are less, and yet he wishes to grow his numbers.

Now the devil spread a blanket of myrrh and folly upon a place where there were many of the devil's people, who were his, and by their numbers, the blanket was able to be spread. Now was it then the devil's domain, that it was a place sunk into hell? But indeed it was not, for the blanket was spread by numbers, and the land was still on land.

Now the devil goes about as a lion or lioness, looking for whom he may devour, and this is not the same as a lion or lioness who is the Lord's.

Now by the devil's servant who is a woman, it is known by Mala, every male in a house-hold must die, and yet by the Lord's servant who is a woman, every male in a house-hold may live. Now these books are religious books, the giving of wisdom and also religion.

Now for those whose opinion is not welcome, nor would it matter in a thing, what type of un-wellness of mind is this? But they do not mind their own business.

Now if an INCEL says to one, you are jealous, and clearly there is no cause to rationalize the accusation, it is their lack of understanding and nihilism, that they mock and take vengeance, for many of them have been called jealous when they do something, and they lack understanding.

Now if they speak of winning, there is no game.

Now if a demon weeps, it is hard to pity, for their weeping is as rage and calamity, not the weeping of people, for the demon throws a tantrum and their weeping is not with tears. Now they cough and sputter, and make all types of disgusting sound.

Now the butterfly is an angel, and it is a sign, and while they a caterpillar, if it is so, and they may become it, they are still an angel when it is so. Now let friends of the angel, if they please, call me Sara, for Saruman, for a young man called me it. Now this is not a thing of the giving of wisdom, and if they call me also, Lucy, it is acceptable, that none be accused, for neither of these things to call me is offensive.

Now I am knowing, too, that it is true, the value of id when coupled with self control and thinking, that these obey the Lord.

Now be zeolous in this thing, if you wish, to remember those who oppose the proverb about the value of id when coupled with self control and thinking, for the devil opposses this, for it is annihilating his kingdoms, that you uphold your brother with support, when he requires brothers, for if your brother is for morality and the wicked for wickedness, it is good that you are coming to support your brother. Now let abuse cease, for the abuses of the wicked and cruel are hard as war-metal, and war-iron, and sharp things are with these proud and insolent, who are wicked, that you stand with your brother when he is for morality, against wickedness as abuse, for when he is against abuse, he is good to be having support from you. Now let the wicked call you wise and strong, fools, for be not wise in your own eyes like the wicked, for whom there is more awareness for a dog who is a fool. For I am a fool, and likewise was Solomon.

Now let Zion be against abuse, mostly in institutions, but also against abuse of family members who have divorced their family member in spirit, for they are able to do so, that if these are being an enemy of hate concealed against a family member, it is also good Zion is being against this abuse, for by being against abuse and standing with your brother when he is requiring brothers, when he is against abuse, so the devil's kingdoms are trampled much and scattered, and the work of the devil lessened greatly on Earth. Now what do I say, but not as a terrorist gang, but as a freedom of citizens who do well, who co-operate, I say conspire with each other, you who are against abuse, you who are strong and wise, and though none of you are men who desire men, yet you are even right to be defending the male who desires the male when it is right.

Now one felt jealousy in them and obeyed God, another felt jealousy in them, and did the work of the devil, and another obeyed God by not acting much, or by doing nothing. Now the devil mocked those who were obeying God, and yet those who did the work of the devil, he did not mock them, or attempt to accuse them when they had done no wrong, for the devil did not mind his own business, for because none did wrong, it was none of his business, and it may be people's business if any does the devil's work.

Now if any sicophant, being woman, attacks an angel and is more man than him, and other women say in their hearts, it is acceptable, for they make an alliance of some women against beauty and against the angels, and against the Lord, indeed these women are already from hell, now if men do the same, doing as this thing mentioned here, indeed these men are already from hell. Now these are wicked people, and there is the devil's people on Earth, and the Lord's people, and they are very different, and yet they appear to be both human, and yet the devil's people are as if not human. Now the devil's people know their master, and their lord in their heart, and though they deny, yet they are loving the devil and hating God, that they are pleased to do the devil's work. Now if the servants of the devil portray the devil's people as being against those who are not the devil's people, as if motivated by religion, yet it is not religion that motivates them, for I do not lie, they know in their heart who their master is, that they do not believe they serve the Lord. Now the devil's servants are sowing confusion in this way, and lack of unity in ways, and it brings about more confusion and foolishness, that the people become as if entering again into Egypt, into a lesser society of greater ignorance. Now those who love Wartak are as those who love Egypt and being held in it, and not with the greater enlightenment of Israel or Salem. Now the servant of comfort and ease, he works tirelessly, his spirit, and it brings the people into confusion and ignorance, and it is not necessary, for how long will he Shepard when he is not needed, and for how long will he Shepard incompetently, to Shepard the people into confusion and what is worse? But he is diligent, and he shepherds much, and diligently, to undo the greater entanglements, and there are other shepherds who do so, and yet the Hebrew Jew, he does not do much of anything, and his hand is so light and he does so little, and he is loyal to another people who he loves, that he has been naive to do it. Now the angel, who can divide him from Muslims, or Muslims from him, but it is seeming odd that any person should speak as if it could be.

Now bitter stones were sown among Christians and Hebrew Jews and there were some sown among the rocks they call conservatives, and there were some sown among the soil, and these stones were sown in many places, and when they changed to Beelzebub, only then could it be known that they were the bitter stone, Beelzebub, who turns into a brutal and mean, old man, for prior to this it cannot be known. Now all the servants of the devil, his people, were among the people, and they were very different, internally, from the people, and yet some were reliable to attempt to encourage the people from repentance in anything, to encourage them with mocking and wrong rebellion to not repent, to not listen to wisdom, and the devil's Shepherds went quickly to the task of sowing confusion and relieving the people of wisdom and truth. Now the Shepherds put forth lies and false-understanding, and they did so well, for it came from their own heart and their own kingdom, which was the devil's that their hearts understood things according to the devil's kingdoms, which are all built upon lies, and it is all lies, every layer of it, and he put forth his kingdom mostly among the soil, it seemed, and yet he also put some lies and foolishness among the rocks, and yet the rocks are with much integrity and many have called them stubborn. Now the devil's people also sowed discord and slandered with blasphemies of people at times, and much more things they did, and they told lies, to encourage people to commit wickedness, that they might be taken by them, to be one of them.

Now jealousy is most often irrelevant, and what a person does is what they are understood to be.

Now if any is insulting people to sow discord, yet they are attempting to divide, and they wish for chaos, for they are an enemy, and yet all they do is turn people against them, and all they do is harass people.

Now a Lord's lion or lioness, it is regarded, and yet a devil's lion or lioness, it is doing the will of the devil.

Now the spirit of a lioness, she came with words like silver and pure light, and she was strong and her lips were pure, and she defended the angel against the devil and she saved him in a way, that it was good.

Now every time the angel seized the spirits of the devil's servants, that they might prophecy for the angel, the devil's servants did not obey, and said the opposite of some things, and even blasphemed. Now they fought like combat in spirit.

Now the father of equality and mercy is a spirit, and it was found mingled with some who were righteous and to what degree, God knows, and with some only a little, and with others much, and one I perceived was separated, and whether the spirit of this father was with him only a little or much, does not matter, for again, if judgment begins at the house of God, how much more is it for others, and there is much chaos and disorder and many have erred because of the chaos, and the angel is not even able to carry out all right order because of the chaos, concerning what he does, and none are permitted to rebuke the Priest-King for this thing, for they do not reason with fear of God, if they do so, or by the truth. But he is now as if having come to Earth from Heaven, and this one I saw, and by wisdom it was understood, and I called him Minus and Joshua Heyudu which is the names I gave, for I did not know his names. Now his spirit rose, for understanding saw it, and he was then as if with the angels, as if a thing come from Heaven, and there was the ark of the covenant in the Temple, the ark in Zion, and was there also a sceptre? Now the sceptre was with the ark. Now I considered, he is right to be having a long robe that is white, and the Pharasees wrong, for they were stones that brought forth a foolish viper, for it was a viper of the devil's, that his wisdom is wickedness and foolishness, for they are wise according to the devil's kingdoms, and fools according to God's kingdoms, and God's kingdoms are truth and the devil's kingdoms, lies and ignorance. Now if there are serpents wise according to the devil's kingdoms and the devil's ways, where the devil is a god to them, and the only god, yet they are wise, and some very wise, and to the truth, fools and very foolish. Now I bring always the devil's kingdom together, that it not be hidden and scattered, that it might be an army that is ready for fight, for he fights as if a cold war, his people among the people of light, and he is having much less people and yet his servants are diligent, and intensely wicked at times. Now their eyes see quickly the good who please God, and already, when a threat is perceived, they go to scheming and conspiring, that you know of it, and yet the righteous scatter them, and abolish their scheming and plans, and much power the Lord has against them, that the Earth is Lord's and He has won a great victory, and yet the devil is wanting to undo it, and I am saying, lessen the devil's kingdoms to nothing, and build further and advance Zion.

Now the priest-hood of the descendants of Japeth, they are anti-abuse, and if they have not been at times, yet I do not defend when they have not been anti-abuse or have committed wickedness.


Now let the Muslims know it, and the Japanese, and then, too, all other people, that where there is one who would torture the innocent, he or she is not even a sycophant, and it has nothing to do with who they would torture, for these are those who are part of the devil-cult, and is it is true in Mala, it is official, too, on Earth, for it is not hate, not jealousy, not envy, not wrath, for it has nothing to do with who they are against, but they are not against them, for they are a member of the devil-cult, and they are those who stand on the right hand side or left hand side of the devil, for they are zealous for his kingdom, to do that which pleases him, to do what would be most wicked and without cause or reason, in order to please the devil. Now these can be any person in any place, and they are scattered throughout the Earth, and there have been some in uniforms of good, and there have been some upon side-walks, asking, and there have been some in every place, and these are fully devoted in heart to the devil, loyal to him with their heart, mind, and soul, loving the devil and his kingdom, zealous to please him. Now their hearts worship the devil, and their hope is in him, the devil. Now they are even higher with the devil than those who would torture beautiful children, and they take pleasure from pleasing the devil in this sycophantic thing, and they are the less mighty than those who stand on either side of the devil, for these knell to the devil, and worship him and their hope is in him, and they take pleasure in the blood-shed of the lake of fire, to desecrate, as sycophants, what is pure and beautiful, that they worship the devil, and so those who are only liking to desecrate, and are sycophantic, this is not sexuality of any type, but it is an opposite thing from those upon land, for their hope is in the devil in this thing, and their loyalty is to them, that they worship the devil in these types of things. Now some Sodomites were these, for Sodom is the devil's, and Sodomites are sycophants, for to be a sycophant is not sexuality.
	

Now the truth is too big, and eight of ten was written in between the comet being between Saturn and Jupiter and it passing close to Earth, and the rest in a month or two after, and all has been within a year, even the short books, and Notes From Salem in the space of the comet, and there is not sufficient time to give more, and do they not have enough wisdom? Now abandon the following of the Old Testament where it is right to abandon, and it is not wrong, and yet there is benefit to its wisdom and guidance. Now why will any be a Pharisee with the New Testament? But those to be Christians are held by Christianity, and those to be Hebrew Jews, held by the Old Testament, and each held to their religion, what they are knowing they are meant to be, and the Lord too knows. Now I consider rest, and resting from the giving of wisdom to the Earth. Now there may never be more given by me for I do not know.


Letter to the Priest-King of the Zion Temple:

Now as of yet I do not know for certain who you are, and yet I have given guidance to who it may be.

Now all the good people of the bible might have a section of pillars before the Zion Temple and the women with them each a pillar. Now all these people are found among our people. Now the twelve disciples and the one who replaced the traitor, these pillars at the front of the Temple before the door. And twelve pillars in the same place, two pillars together for each of the sons of Jacob and they are of our people. Or perhaps they are all around the Temple. Now will there not be a house of Adam and Eve and a house of Enoch and a house of Noah that come prior to the Temple? Now what signifies Abraham and Sarah? Now Abraham is now father of many nations. Now the Christ brought about the victory for he embarked upon a suicide mission and now the whole Earth is filled up with Zion. Now are there not the things of Joshua, David, and Solomon? Now take a staff that is sturdy if you like, held by a wizard, or in this case an angel, and if you wish to signify Shepherding committed by me then it will suffice. Now do you not owe Sauramon an apology? But the story was not as it was told. Now Tolkien, a Christian, avoided everything and he is on his own and yet he has mattered much to  the diary and whether he saw things in visions I do not know. Now I am Saturn and the Christ the morning star and Jupiter the diary and the seven eyes are the rings and it is one-thousand, being light, and the comet the time of the writing of the diary and notes from Salem and the Christ’s teachings, Venus, they are seeming smaller and yet the Christ was greater and fulfilled all. Now one-thousand is light. Now has not Tolkien intentionally told the opposite in much? But he is good to do so, for it is wise of him to go around all things with innocence and he gives great room and does not meddle in anything I have indulged in. Now by going around all there is no prophecy in what he has done and has he not perceived many things? Now I opened the seal of Zorrobabel and the book I have desired and yet I do not know all the prophecy. Now have there not been artists in history who have prophecies not knowing it in their books and in their works and who have perceived true things, for they are the Lord’s, having the Lord as their creator, those who bring forth these things. Now without a Barnum statement there is not much room for subjective validation. Now angel people, some of them have greatly excelled in some things, and these I call people who are in the fashion of angels. Now what is the Temple Zion? But it represents Zion, being a sign of Zion, and what is the ark? But it is representing God in Zion. Now what is a good thing in Zion may be within the Temple, and Joab, being a vigilante, is  at the entrance of the Temple, and he is also a soldier and general. Now let there not be calamitous things in the Temple, but only things of Mala that are significant to Zion and Zion as a whole and the angel and those things of angels, there is Muslims to consider and Saudi Arabia, for leave out Muslims from the Temple because they have Saudi Arabia and their sacred cities, that you not blaspheme, and the angel you do not have to leave out. Now can any people understand what is right in some things concerning angels more than Muslims? But it is good that none are not speaking in an odd and wrong way to ever bring discord between Muslims and the angel, for such is odd injustice of mouth.
	Now these are only ideas I have for the Temple, and I give them in peace, and you are King in this, and this is the council I offer concerning the fashion of the Temple, and what it may be, and yet I know the people are many, and too many to represent with pillars, and there are perhaps thousands from every tribe and each of these a different type of person and the disciples, too, representing the tribes. Now I write in a less formal way than my books, for it is correspondence that I have chosen to include with the books. Now in the future, if you are to correspond with me, I will not cause fear for us both and include letters that the public may have them.
	Now because of the wars of America, it is considered to be possibly unacceptable for the Zion Temple to be in America, and yet the Priest-King chosen by the Lord, he is likely an American, and yet to be loyal to it, he must betray it for Zion to be for Zion first and foremost. Now I cannot tell you what to do, for you are now as if a thing from Heaven, as the angel is not one of the people, but a thing from Heaven, for this I write to the Priest-King, who I call Joshua Heyudu and what name he chooses, I do not know, but his name is given in the book of Zecheriah. Now to to this Priest-King, he who will build the Zion Temple, the Hebrew Jews, have they not been told to flee from Zion that dwells with the daughter of Babylon? Now she is rebelling to such an extent that she will not be judged by the Lord, but instead purifies herself by the lake of fire if she commits adultery, or any iniquity, and she is seeming pure, but is not pure, for she is lower than a slave, and emerged from hell, that she is Babylonian. Now these things the Hebrew Jews are given by the Lord to flee from, they are indeed a problem for Zion, as well, that Zion should be free of Babylon and all the devil's kingdoms that the devil seeks to place on Earth. Now if you are given to build the Temple, I only offer my council in what I believe the Temple is supposed to be, as a general idea of what types of things are for the Temple and its likeness. Now I am also believing it is good that the Temple be accessible to Americans, easily, close to the border for them, and accessible for the Earth, close to a place where people may be able to land from across the seas. But it may not be possible, and none can stop you from building the Temple, for religion is not forbidden. Now if any bows to anything in the Temple, even if it is given that it is respectful to Zion that it not be so, yet I do not consider there is need for great offence from any, for it is their own sin, if they sin.

Of the garden of Zion: there is yet a god, who may be like a god by accepting the fruit I give him or her, if they are wealthy enough, for the business-people, some of them, have said, I am a god, and yet as of yet there have been none as such, and yet has not the Lord desired it, that it is good? For the Lord has given some the ability to be excellent in business, and is He not willing that some should as gods, to be made gods of Zion? Now this is the fashion of Greek gods, and yet not Greek, but what is in truth, Zion gods, and I offer the fruit from the tree, and it has the corner stone, the Christ, and if any is worthy of this this, is not the Lord too wishing for them to be a god of Zion? Now if any is greatly desiring a good thing, is not the Lord also wanting that they should have it? But they receive praise in taking their reward, for they attain a good thing, and do they not also receive the approval of God, that he is pleased with them in taking what they desire, when it is good thing they desire? Now the devil offered fruit from the tree against life, and he spoke according to the devil's kingdom, that they should be as gods by eating of the fruit, and it happened to their death, and their eyes were opened, and in this way they were given, and yet it was not what was desired, and so there may be only one who will be remembered 5000 years from now, who was wealthy, because the Lord has desired that there should be a god in Zion, and many will not so, for I cannot permit it to be considered that many are gods, but only two or three may be gods, and if there are others, yet they are people receiving blessing, and these have not desired to be gods, for it has not been in their heart, that the Lord has desired that some of these excellent business-people should be gods, and what others have desired, when they have desired a good thing, is the Lord not also wanting that they should have these things? Now the devil's kingdoms are worthless wrecks and nothing compared to Zion and indeed they are build up with ignorance, and they are emerged from below the Earth, not having right to be on land. Now if the devil offered fruit to death and toil on land, that people should work and die, and suffer the dust, another, the angel who is a satan, which is an ancient serpent, offers fruit unto god-hood, and the Lord will be God, and them, and it may only be a few, a god of Zion. Now if he or she who is worthy is declared such when they have eaten of the fruit I will offer, then to them all the profit of what I have written will go to them, and only what is written they cannot alter and they may not remove anything from it or add anything to it, and they may sell in any way they please, and it will be associated with them, by the religion of what I offer, associated with Zion, for it is not an informal thing, but they are remembered as being a god of Zion, part of Zion, for as they have declared themselves gods, yet the Lord gives it to a few, and they have not desired a wrong thing. Now this is not the same as what is written about slaves, who are gods, and this is implied. Now if the angel rejects any, it will be because they may not be a god of Zion.

Now the Lord gives His promise and threat concerning two people who should not be harmed:

“Awake, O sword, against my shepherd, even against the man [that is] my fellow, saith Jehovah of hosts: smite the shepherd, and the sheep shall be scattered, and I will turn my hand upon the little ones.”

Now the Lord has offered a membership of business, and I will not declare it for more than two or three, and if any is rejected, they will not be declared a god of Zion, and yet I believe there is only one, and yet do I know? Now this will be the Lord's fellow, a god of Zion.

Now the whole Earth is filled up with Zion, and all people on Earth, every person should have these books I have written, for it is what is good for Zion and the kingdoms, and in what things you make other things concerning it, these too are owned by the god of Zion, what other things he makes that are emerging from these books, that all profit is going to him, and he is offered the fruit, and it must be discussed with him or her, who it may be, and agreed upon, and it will be included in what I write that this is the fellow of the Lord.

Of Job: there is a man who is robbed by the devil of many good things, because of the puritanical-ism, and by the giving of wisdom, these things he was able to have, them being good, he may be able to have again, for these are good things.

Now the fellow of the Lord, the god of Zion, he is associate with the Lord, from what I understand, and not in the sense that Muslims might mean the term, for I intend it in the way of business, for the god of Zion, from what I understand, is welcome by the Lord. Now this is an exceedingly greater thing than those who are gods, written about in The Diary of Lucifer who are separate from the people, for these are gods among the people, and I do not write of slaves, but those who are separated, being strong and with great integrity, of great kindness, for this kindness separates them and it is a thing among the people, of Solomon, and not of David, and yet these are still people, and it is recognized among the people, from the perspective of the people who look up to one who is clearly exceptional among the people, a god among men, of men, and some are women, and none of these are impious, but they are exceptionally known for not being impious, of having a tongue that does not descend, for it is not impious, that is curses not, and is kind, that it is strong in integrity, this tongue, for they who are a god, it is actually a mighty man or a mighty woman, of a type, for some of these are like gods among them. Now in comparison to the fellow of the Lord, let them then be considered people, for it is a far different thing, and the fellow of the Lord, the god of Zion, indeed there is likely only one who can be this. Now they are indeed part of Zion, and a valid thing. Now Zechariah did not come to me first, but the book second, and it came from understanding, when I offered the fruit, and so there was a god of Zion, and it was indeed right, and also there was a Priest-King and it was right.

Now this thing especially I council to Jerusalem, that you discern who is the devil's among you, even if you are against some new tradition and honour that has come between now and the ancient times, and that it may be an internal matter for you, that you shut your ears to mocking, if there should be any. For as Beelzebub sows himself among Christians, so he sows himself among you, and in the form of a man or woman. Now I have opened the seal of Zorrobabel, as it is called among others, and there is a portion of you who are not intelligent to be wicked, believing in the foolishness and ignorance that the Shepherds of the devil have taught, that you will trick God and do wickedly by the judgment that is not of another people, or a judgment of your own people, but the small portion's judgment, that is guided by the devil's Shepherds. Now those not rejecting this ease and compassion, are they one of the people? But even if half of you has not rejected this ease and compassion, and ignorance, then will not one half be cut off from you? Now do not worship the golden calf of Babel, or any golden calf that comes from the pieces of knowledge and understanding of your people, but you have been given Moses and the Old Testament, and it is not an idol. Now I do not know how the Lord will judge who is to be cut off and who is to remain, only that the Lord has told the Hebrew Jews to flee from Zion. Now do not rebel against me with any ignorance within you that says I am other than what I am, for the ignorance, the premise, you do not state, and I am not anything you have known, and nor am I one of the people among the sons of Noah, but I am fair shade and yet different from them. But if you pay good to me, will I repay you evil? Now for the time, I am only hoping you will have peace. Now what does the Lord say to you, but you not discern between those who are the Lord's and who are the devil's, but you have the perception of the circumcision of Jews, that you are keeping to the teachings you have been given, and I have already advised other people, that they be keeping to their realm, whether they are Christians, Zion Jews, or otherwise, that each is keeping to their things, of the things they have been given, and I give wisdom that is even wisdom of angels, and yet it is likely it is not good for you, being Hebrew Jews, to keep any of these things in your speech, for you are given the circumcision and the realm of such, for you are able to do well perceiving things as what you have, that there are those who serve God and those who do not, for there have been Pentecostal people who have made themselves mixed in a way not to their benefit, it would seem, and yet only they know if the addition of wisdom not in their realm is acceptable. Now you know of Philistines, but of Babylon, is this in your realm? Now I have written of these things prior. Now for those whose way is to obey the law of Moses, that they obey more of it, do they not reap the benefits of obeying more of it? Now if you would not convert to Zion, I will not say you are not given what you are given, and if you obey it all in another way, then you are those at one level and other Jews at another level, and yet you are still Jews, are you not? Now still, the wisdom of angels should not likely be mixed in with you, for you are given the circumcision, and you are given the things of people, of men and women. Now until Israel, or Jerusalem, by Zechariah, is obeying at the higher level, to be obeying what they have been given, the angel cannot visit the Temple unless the Muslims seize it while he visits, and it is good that there are also Jews in the Temple as well when it is so. Now if you are obeying at the greater degree then there is no need for Muslims to seize the Temple, or for the angel to be accompanied by Muslims, and then why would the angel visit the Temple? Now in what ways shall you return in obeying more? But the Lord tells you in what ways you shall return to obeying more, and He tells you in the book of Zechariah. Now if you obey in the things God has told you you shall return in, then there again will be no need for Muslims to seize the Temple if the angel visits, or for Muslims to accompany him, for it is sufficient for the angel.

Now those who are like priests, who are Zion Levites, these were always good, and those like priests, who are Hebrew Levites, these were always good, and they are brought out from the foolishness and confusion and are right as they were always right, for they are your priests, Zion and Jerusalem. Now if they seem less tolerant, yet they are priests. 

Now to Joshua Heyudu, the best I know his name, I believe he should be in long robes, white garments, and a turban of priests, and it rightly being a turban of a king, for he is the Priest-King of Zion. Now there are those who are called catholic, and they have turbans upon their heads, and something as this is the type of turban that is fitting for a Priest-King, and the long, white robes of these, that the unworthy robes are not fitting for being High-Priest, that with councils of peace, he is given long, white robes, and the turban of the Priest-King, and the crowns are each placed upon his head that are for a memorial and sign. Now he is written about in the book of Zechariah, and here he is called Joshua, and he is a different type of Joshua from the Joshua of the bible.

Now I have been indeed a Shepherd and yet confessing, I am not able to Shepherd any of you, for I have not been a Shepherd as the others, for I have Shepherded separately. Now if the angel of the covenant has been a Shepherd, he has also opened the seal of Zorrobabel, and he has mostly mentioned to the Hebrew Jews, the Lord's word to them in the book of Zechariah, for he wondered if they had noticed it. Now Zion is present, and Jerusalem is present, and if the Lord has told the Hebrew Jews to flee from Zion, then Jerusalem will have a multitude more of their people, for the priest-hood of Japeth, are they not knowing what is right? Now what is written? But Jerusalem will be towns without walls for the multitude of people in it, and so I ask for the Hebrew Jews, the daughters, do not resent me, for I obey the Lord.

Now you other Shepard's, be not rebellious as if good is evil and evil is good, for if there is any difficult thing that occurs, yet the Lord is God, and there is good without rebellion, without hate, with love from you other Shepherds, that you are able to do good without rebellion against what is good, that some have called good evil and evil good. Now it is not sport to rebel against what is good, when it is something from the Lord and not as things you have dealt with before.

Now you Hebrew Jews, the daughters, if women from another people are jealous, that they rebel, and to sow discord between the angel and you, you who are for the Lord's will, than you are wise enough to know they are jealous of you that they do so.

Now if the Lord has commanded the Hebrew Jews to flee from Zion, that you wise men, of the Hebrew Jews, worthy to be councillors even to Solomon, you are able to know what is right. Now I extend to you wise men councils of peace, and words of peace, and I am for holy times being. Now what has the Lord said? But your king is among you, and he is not the elected official, that you know the Lord cannot lie, and the seal of Zorrobabel has been opened. Now though you not find him, for you may not be able, yet he is among you, and he is the king recognized by the Lord. Now in one thing, he is greater than David, and the angel does not give any words to him, for the angel fears God. Now do you believe the angel is an evil thing of the devil? But do not think the angel will oppress any of you, or insult any of you, for even if the angel commits error, and the Lord finds fault with even the angels, yet you will know then what is wrong, and the Lord, your father and creator, is your God. Now I so repent of calling those more cool than cool, as the youth might say, those mighty, a type of mighty, as being gods, for it is cancelled from me, only it may still be read, that there are the gods, who are slaves, and there is the fellow of God, who is god of Zion, and no other gods are there, that you not speak to injustice of any person who is a god that is not either a slave, or the opposite, the god of Zion. For there are no gods among any people, and it is cancelled, for the angel committed error in this way. Now what these are, where I have called them gods when they are not slaves, you may call them a special mighty, that people respect society and that they are regarded where it is right to be regarding them.

Now that the devil might not use me, if any woman is involved with a man, a young man, or man, that there is love, indeed this woman would injure herself, tearing away all of her, to become a slave, if she would be departing to become wife of the king or angel, for she would tear away herself, like a disgusting mutilation and thing of horror and gore, to become, from a woman, a prostitute of the enemy and slave in doing this, that she could not even be with the angel if she did so, and she could not be with a king who would not be a slave, that the devil not be able to use a king or the angel, for if she is involved in any way, being involved by love, it is also as marriage, and it would be a disgusting thing, and there is worse things with it, for she could not be with an angel, and she could not be with a king unless the king was a slave to all the people. Now let the devil not sow discord anymore. Now where there is the different type of love, where there is no hurt or offence if she departs easily to go with another man, that none is offended, the man is knowing it is not sin and is not offended. Now one is marriage, the same, and the other, only sex and a different type of love, and do not think I blaspheme in mentioning this.

Now none of the people have regarded the Shepherd of compassion and ease in this thing, where he has spoken foolishness and ignorance, for the devil's kingdom, to say a woman is the same as a man, for if they are equal, it is acceptable to say, for the angel, too, has said they are equal, and yet they are not the same, and their goodness and what is good and evil for them, is different, and in some things it is the same, and so the woman who wants to be a man, she is a slave, even a prostitute of the enemy, for a slave is not male or female, and she may be treated as a man, if she is committed, indeed, a slave, and the woman who has a problem with God, to be in cosmic struggle against God, who created her, and the man, who says, I may commit adultery if my husband sleeps with a concubine, that she says, which is wickedness for her, there is no differences between men and women, for she does not say actually in her heart that they are not equal, for the angel says men and women are equal, and she is saying I may commit adultery, for I am willingly ignorant, though none of the people have regarded the ignorance and foolishness, then she does not go to war with man, for none of these women go to war with man, and if they are cowards to attack his sons, when they have a problem with God, yet the war they fight is only against God, and it is a cosmic war, for they fight for the devil, and not for women, for women are having God as their father, that they are cut off from the people in this thing, completely cut off, and they are not even bastards, that they are with the devil, and they see God, and look upon Him, and they war with Him, then you fight in combat, ignorant soldier, brutal animal, and the angel desires to cut you down with great wrath and no mercy, for you war against God, and do not repent, for you have chosen to fight the Lord God, who is God of the Universe, and it is not the business of the men or women of Earth anymore, for they do not see it, and do not know of it. Now prepare yourself for battle on the last day, and array yourselves with the devil's people, and let the sword be upon you, and yourself being cast into the lake of fire. For what is your problem with God, and why have you chosen combat? But you, wicked and stubborn fool, if you will fight God, then let the fire please you, and eternal anguish, pain that will drive you insane continuously. Now it is no concern of the people, and the people cannot see it, or know of it, and indeed it is not their business or concern, and you are a man, a combat soldier, a wicked and rebellious fool. Now were you not before a slave, that you deceived a man into marrying you? But now you are separated from the people, easy prey for combat, and there is now right to kill you utterly, for you do war against God, and do not the angels care? Now the same as the man who is a slave, for he is, who would commit adultery with you, and both of you do war against God, both slaves, and slaves beneath slaves, being slaves of slaves. Now as for those slaves already apparent, they have no right to speak on this matter, and neither does their opinion matter.

Now a disturbing demon has been a child in a man's body, and he has loved greatly an institution as his father, for the institution is his father, in spirit, and he is but an innocent child and yet his other elders he does not honour, and he acknowledges no others, no elder, or any person, but this institution that is his father. Now who his many parents then are, I do not know, but they are only those part of an institution or organization of some type. Now I have offended him without meaning to, for I have not known that these were his parents, in spirit. Now what says the devil? But are we to consider the children of the devil as the same God's children, and the children of the Lord's kingdoms with regards to what the Christ has spoken? Now of course it is not so. For there are the Lord's goats, and the devil's goats, the Lord's elephants and the devil's elephants, everything the Lord has the devil has attempted to match it and produce his own, and they are extremely different, each being the opposite, and there is even the Lord's Joseph, and the devil's Joseph, the Lord's Benjamins and the devil's Benjamins, and as Elijah and Moses stand on either side of the Christ, so there are those who stand on either side of the devil, in hell.

Now I have not yet seen him or her, but who will the devil bring who is the opposite, for response, to be the devil's High Priest, of the devil's kingdom?

Now those who lack a logical portion of the brain, for whom the wrong answer may be as good as the right answer, for this will be considered the core of it, these people I call Raclum and it is wicked to call any it, for you shall not use what I give as an insult against any for it is a wicked insult, and it is disruptive and injustice to God, for the one who speaks it is hypocrite in speaking in it, for to speak it is to be it, because both are it, and all are it, that all people are Raclim. Now that which is exceedingly severe in this lack of logic, being unconcerned for logic, truth, and essentially truth, being as mud, and even slime, these people if they are then slaves, to be beneath the Earth, brutal and iniquitous, and very cruel, and them being gods, they should be enslaved, for you will not have order if it is not accomplished, and yet I do not know if you will obey in this thing, and those who are very severe in this lack of logic, truth, unconcerned for truth, and it being consistent for much time, and in things that are not matters of debate and contention, for what is called nature of people, what they cannot change about themselves according to nature, is not a matter of debate or contention, then these should be given the label of Raclum and these are not what is called mentally ill, and these are a separate people from the people, that they are not bastards, for it is not a metaphor to be a bastard, but they are mud and slime, and they are with slaves. Now as for mental illness, all are mentally ill in Zion, and fools are those who are not mentally ill in Zion, only there should be no probation for it anymore, for does it not come from the war between one half of the world and the other half, another thing called the cold war? Now put away the probation and the lack of capacity, as they have called it, for it is foolish as things invented by slaves who have no sense, and you are able to find other laws and ways, for you are not an uncivilized and ignorant people.

Now because they are always placing their people in places in the ongoing cold war between nations, give none too much ability to take action, for they may be able to launch as much destruction as possible. Now open not the gate of the city to the enemy soldiers, by night or by day, and if it is pried open and held open by device, remove the device, you people who are not blind, and shut the gate to the enemy, for let it be understood by the law-makers, you shall not pry open the gate for enemy nations, for they are always placing their people in one nation or another and it is the ongoing cold war that is always ongoing between nations. Now you do not have enough spy-hunters to find them all, and they are diligent and tireless, and they recruit our own citizens, those who have been made angry at your own nation, them being from your nation, and they mislead them, for it is them who do injustice to them and then recruit them under a different flag that you rescue those being done injustice, for it is your responsibility to do so, and in this you should be diligent, for it is loyalty to your nation. Now if any law-makers have opened the gate, giving too much power to any, quickly you shall remove the power, and write other laws if you must, and you will close the gate, for it is treason to open the gate by concealment of darkness, and if it is mistake, yet it must be closed quickly. Now be not a foolish people, like wicked children, who are against your own nation. Now keep to the integrity of the mountains and rocks, that you not become mud, you who are soil. Now remove no bow from the mountain tribes, when it is a bow for hunting, for they are having a covenant with David. Now let there be no rocks who have turned to salt, who attack the soil that is not mud, for this is very wicked and very foolish. But the salt of the Earth is not for attacking the soil, and there are some salt of the soil. Now build a house among the rocks, for it is wise.

Now a spirit appeared at the probation and lack of capacity of Eretz Chadrack, and in Zion, it was a Babylonian woman, for if you remove these things, you will kill the spirit that resides there, for her spirit is a woman of Babylon, that she is a spirit, for only she, being an enemy to the people, of a kingdom of hell, not even a nation of Earth, has liked this thing.

Now there are some whose greatest desire is to do something that will be to their death, and it is life for them, that they are to be permitted. Now it has been said by another, all die but not all live.

Now the children of the devil, these are not as the children of the Lord's kingdoms. Now do not the devil's people support the devil's children?

Now the children of men, atheists who are like children, so far these are seen to be harmless, and it is a test of a man, if they are the children of men. Now the children of men, these are not the devil's children, or children of the devil.

Now do you not allow the elderly to die at their home, if the volcano is going to erupt? But they wish to die where they have lived, and to not become like a refugee. Now the angel is believing you should allow them.

Now when the time for something has passed, it is passed, and reap the blessing of the new things that you get.

Now a spirit of Babylon seems to appear at a thing that is unjust that is not even discrimination, that none have been for this, and only an enemy of a foreign nation, of the devil's kingdoms, is liking it.

Now there is a thing in which if you do not kill all the enemy, all those who are wicked and in wickedness against you, men will not pardon you, and you will receive the punishment for all, because you have left one alive, and yet pardon is for the person who kills all the wicked who are in wickedness against you. Now I looked and all these who were the enemies were attacking aggressively with slander, as dogs that are viscous and trained to attack, and these were dogs of the devil, and they lied and slandered, and attacked this way viciously, continuing to attack in this way. Now if there is a pack of dogs, then every dog that is attacking is then killed, for they are intelligent enough, these dogs, to keep attacking. Now defend your fellow citizen against dogs of the devil, unless you are with the devil, for what citizen sees such, and having the power, does not also defend? But to what degree you are judged, you are judged, for the righteous does not lose by nihilism, or injustice, that if you reason by nihilism, there is not nihilism, and you reason foolishly. Now the Lord can make you Babylonian, and many things may happen to you, and when your heart turns to wickedness, because of your wickedness, it will be known what you were. Now the righteousness of a man cannot judge differently than God, and it is blasphemy, for if he justifies the wicked, he is wicked in this thing. Now it may then be said, dogs fell with dogs for the people were with the dogs. Now then what was the purpose more, but that other people should have to be struck down by the Lord? For was it not a test, and yet it was valid.

Now then go with the angel, women, what wisdom he gives, and with the Lord, for if your father justifies the wicked, yet you are receiving mercy and life with God, and go with the man or young man who is with the Lord, that you go with God. Now if married, do well for you house, be doing good towards the Lord's kingdoms, for in such you love your husband, and it goes well for your house, for it is wisdom of you. Now the Lord is not David, moving throughout the land with an army, for He is Love, and creator of husband and wife, that the angel is not a fool, and knows you do well because of loyalty and love to your husband, to do good to your house, and your husband is blessed by God because of you, not cursed. Now ignore the story of David in this thing, for none would be incurring any harassment of spirit if not for this story. But this story is meant for other things, for another man was very wicked when he had been done very well by a general of an army, so that he was like a wicked demon to him after having been done good and having been blessed by him. Now if any detects nihilism in the Old Testament, it is brought about the devil that any should believe it, for it is even found in the mouths of those who have no right to it, or any of the Old Testament scriptures, for they have no place among one group, and have no right to be speaking the scripture in wickedness against them. Now this is wickedness and blasphemy, and it mocks religion and God.

Now mountains have survived floods of mud and slime and so have those mountain tribes, and when there is a flood, it is good that the righteous are fleeing to the mountains.

Now offers the opinion when it is not respecting society? But if any does it, why are they surprised to be ignored? Now where a person is directly effected by something, then their opinion is valid, and yet in things that do not respect society, yet it is known that their opinion does not matter. Now there were older women, committing betrayal of their husbands, to go to young men, with grievances for their husband, as if the young man was their husband. Now there were women meddling in things between a man and woman who were in love, for she was attempting to take her place, and even if she was another wife, yet she would have no place in this. Now they were prostitutes of the enemy, and were they not jealous of women, that they kept attacking their men? Now there were other prostitutes of the enemy, for the devil, that they were against those who please God.

Now over nine out of ten, and ninety-eight out of ten were not seeming to be the devil's people, and yet where they were gathered together more, they were carrying out much wickedness, and they behaved as if they had taken all the Earth. Now there were the wise of the devil, being wise by his kingdoms that are lies, and fools by the truth, which is the Lord's kingdoms.

Now the corner stone of these writings is The Christ and the horses that have gone out walking are making the atmosphere pleasing to the angel, for it will be okay, and the atmosphere is pleasing, and yet the land of the North, it is being reckless, at times, it would seem, and it is a fast moving river in many ways and have they not lost control of many of their people? Now better a slow moving river for business people, that they may prepare, and a reliable river that does not lash out and destroy with speed. But I consider the Nile, as being better than a fast moving river.

Now by Fruedian projection, one of the seven eyes, what comes from a person's mouth is sometimes revealing what was not realized about that person, for some are much practising Fruedian projection, and there are some saying, be less a man, and they need to be less a man, and some saying, child, and they are a child, and some judging, and they desire to be judged, for it is not sub-concious for them, and men saying, homosexual, because they are attracted, sexually, that they see what is not there, and the imaginations are forming because of projection, that they believe the imaginations that are also projection. Now this is one of the seven eyes.

Now if business-people move quickly, yet the Nile may be reliable and slow, and though a person move quickly, yet the Nile endures, and though Zion is already and moves quickly, yet the Nile remains. Now this is the river I call Gevallus and it is government and democracy, and it pertains to government, that the river Gevallus is often a slow moving and reliable river for the safety of the people, and Eretz Chadrack, and even all of Zion, are dependant upon Gevallus where it is in a place called America, that is also Zion, and Gevallus is having representatives who vote from the people, and it is having a more prominent leader than in Eretz Chadrack, for he is a Priest-King, and of America, pertaining to Gevallus and all its abilities to direct and give abundance from its Greek city that is with the river Gevallus. Now the Earth, much of it, is dependant upon Gevallus in this area, called America, to be reliable. Now there is a Greek city that is called Washington and there is a Priest-King who oversees Gevallus and is the High-Priest of America, and it is a Greek city and Greek priest-hood, and there is a like-wise thing in Eretz Chadrack, but the leader is not as prominent in Eretz Chadrack.

Now there is one who is become sexually perverted by puritanicalism, and it is wickedness, for the puritanicalism in his mouth is perversity, but the righteous know what is acceptable.

Now a prostitute of the enemy is not permitted to bully and insult in the places of work, for it might make unwell that others cannot work, and the others must then be more intelligent and capable than them, that they are the thing of no merit and value with concerns to their benefit, and they bully and attempt to disable those who are capable and of greater ability. So they are an enemy to the nation, and to the people. For you are adults, and beyond the land of child-hood, the child-hood things are put away, for you are judged more severely, and reason is demanded, that a child will rule over them who is more a child then them, and it being right, for this is the right order of the thing, that they are too beneath a person to descend to deal with a person, that it goes to another, the child, to deal with this person, for they have no right to pass by the child to attack the person they attack. Now the prostitute of the enemy, she is ruled over by the child, if he is young enough, and she is his girl-friend, that it is abomination for the man to take the girl-friend of the child, indeed, adulterous even, for she should not even be near to the man most of the time. So it is made right. Now some things are for the wife to deal with, other things for women to deal with, and other things for the child. Now does not this woman, who is girl-friend to the child, for she is not as other women in these types of matters, does she not rail against men in spirit, that she has wrath, for is she not upset that he who she is girl-friend towards is not accepted into society? Now the man is not her husband, for she hates him, and she is from another people, foreign, spiritually, and the child, he is making her a citizen, for she has been dealt with unjustly by the foreign nation that she comes from when considering the child, that she is his girl-friend, being far better than the foreign nation that has made her as she is. Now this nation has been cruel and wicked, and it has robbed her, and the hope of the kingdoms of the Lord is better. Now though the child, he may not touch her, for I write of romantic things, yet will he not then in the future, be her husband? Now despair to the woman who is prostitute of the enemy, who is not girl-friend to any child, for she is with the devil, and what time is there for her anymore? For she is not as her who is girl-friend to the child. Now these others, they are those of the enemy, who are slaves, or prostitutes of the enemy, being of the kingdoms of the devil, that they wage cosmic war against those who please God. Now if any woman is seeming such, who has departed from her husband, because he is a man who desires men, when he desires the man who is a child, that he takes actions in these things, that it is understood to be so, for then there is not misunderstanding, that she departs from her husband, as if adultery, to be girl-friend to a child, a man, then she too is a woman who has been dealt with unjustly, who is made foreign, that a child, he is the way for her, and her adultery is going away from her. Now by this she is made a being of light, purified, for she has been dealt with unjustly, and so if she is doing well, then she is made a being of light, more holy than she was prior to her husband's wickedness. Now she will become a Christian, to be a priest, for the Christians are a royal priest-hood, and for the people she will be of the ritual that she will dip her feet in the river, in the water, and she will be garbed in a white robe, and the pure water will be sprinkled upon her hands, and she will be declared pure, and a priestess of the priest-hood of the Lord, by the salvation of His son, the Christ, that it is for the people, that she has been girl-friend to a child, following her husband's wickedness, and the child may not touch her romantically, and then after this is declared, that she is pure and a priestess of the Lord, then a sprinkling of the pure water will be upon her head and she may depart, for she goes forth without adultery, and she is more pure and holy than she was prior, that she may then marry a man, and she is not the girl-friend of the child anymore. Now sit with the child, you who are a woman, for you are not his chaperone. So the angel gives this, by wisdom, and it is not a heathen thing, but a thing of religion, of Mala, and it is performed on land, even for some for the people. Now only a child who is like a man already, for you are able to discern, is right for this, that it not be a child prone to telling on others when there is no good reason to, for this child, he is able to be a man. Now though he is likely emotional, yet he develops early. Now this child who is right for this, will not be offended at all by this thing, but it is honour to him. Now so also, in this like fashion, was the angel when he was a child, and there was no transgression.


Now further the rings of Saturn, truth, being one-thousand, and also seven, go to The Diary of Lucifer and the books also part of the The Diary. Now where does a woman not commit adultery? But in matters where her husband desires men, and acts upon it, whether he desires adults or the man who is a child. Now King David has done it where it is a man who desires men. 

Now who has been perfect in what he has written? But The Prophet, concerning Islam, has been perfect, for he keeps to the realm of Muslims with perfection, and a person has said, they will see, with regards to an angel, that he does not say or explain more, and so a person keeps to the realm of Muslims. Now they are forbidden alcohol, to be holy, and forbidden wearing gold, for an angel may wear gold, that he is more considerate of angels than any, and the Muslims more considerate of angels than any. 

Now there is a white staff for me, and it has the three points of The Diary of Lucifer and it has been seen by one, and he has given what he perceived in an innocent way, for he has avoided all, and told the opposite, that he has done well.

Now Cain, not being kings, but those gone in the way of Cain, Tolkein has perceived as Nazgul, and they are swift to shed blood. Now I, too, perceive them as Nazgul.

Now Muslims have their sacred cities in Saudi Arabia, and the Zion Jews, and others have the Zion Temple, and Hebrew Jews, they have their Temples and the land of Israel. Now Japanese people, they are upon the platform that shakes, the Island of Mount Fuji, and they are Zion and yet separate, being part of the ranks of the angels on Earth, that they have their right ways that do not involve the Zion Temple. Now Christians, the royal priest-hood, they have the Temple of the Lord in Heaven, and God, that they are the royal priest-hood. Now all may visit the Zion Temple.

Now Saruman has preserved trees, saving them all, and the doctrines of foolishness and ignorance, by Gandalf, have been for destroying all the people groups and laying chaos and destruction to the forests. Now Hobbits are not Jews, but the devil's Jews, and not really Jews, and Zion they wish to destroy, and cover the Earth with foolishness and ignorance, and even more, the kingdoms of the devil that there be great abuse in every place upon the Earth, and that all that is sacred might be desecrated, each thing by each thing, and that perversity with abuse might spread across the land. Now no longer does Lucifer wish the alliance of the grey, who does not commit to right or wrong, and so commits to wrong, for he goes to even more filthy robes and ways, and the people with him, becoming more disgusting and wicked. Now the people may defend themselves and are right to do so.

Now if there is a person like Esua, servant to Jacob, accusing Jacob, who is not more man than man, as Esua is, then you need not begin an ideology, but Esua you are able to rebuke and deal with.

Now it is considered iniquity in a fashion to refuse to sell corn that has no nutritional value, when you have some to sell to a person who is addicted to it. Now blessing is upon the head of him who sells corn, and curses for him who has it in his possession and refuses to sell it, if he has much.

Now there is a daughter of Babylon who is disgusting, and she loves wickedness and injustice, being wise by the devil's kingdoms in things of wickedness, but a pet dog, an actual animal, knows her iniquity, and is judge over her, for his righteousness and worth is beyond her and he is better than her.

Now a leader of men must be righteous.

Now a different concept: the woman who loves a large dog, is she not a blessed one? Now this is a thing of a virtuous woman, who cares for animals, who has many virtues. 

Now a young woman who loves angels, the ark of the covenant appears, and numbers of God, for the ark appears over her head, a spirit, and there is the rising of smoke, forty. Now these are good things, and if more signs are needed, more spirits, yet they appear over her head. Now nothing appears over the head of the Japanese woman, for nothing is required to appear over her head, and she is part of the ranks of angels. Now let the women of different religions tell what must appear, and it kept secret, for what these spiritual women know must be, yet let it be part of the secret books that are kept, that these books are holy, and they will say what should be in these books and what must be. Now there is light and signs, and other things, for each of the women of different religions to know, that they are able to say. For where there is another thing we have not known of, yet it is a search for wisdom, and it is not revealed unto the people, because of the mouths of blasphemers, who desecrate. Now let it be a society then, concerning women, and other things of angels you will not reveal, that the devil's servants may use these things. For if you find a woman, rare, who has good things appearing, yet it may indicate there is yet another religion of the Lord that is yet to emerge.

Now as for others, yet should there not be societies who are seeking wisdom, who are devoted to the holiness of wisdom?

Now if there is ever a devil-cult, studying the things of the devil and his wisdom, yet do not the devil-cults already do so?

Now what appears over her head? But each woman according to what her group is in Zion, and an angel is according to a Japanese woman, if she loves an angel. Now are there not some Zion Jews and Hebrew Jews who are women, who are also like the Japanese woman, for whom nothing appears above their head? But you are not the he-goats of Zechariah, but the she-goats, are you not? Now do you not make your way among the rocks, and nimble are you among the rocks, for you go up to high places where people cannot climb, interloping in high places where you do not belong, and it is no offence, for you are the she-goats, and is this not the reason, that you go up the mountain and nothing appears over your head? Now your interloping steps are nimble, indeed, sure-footed, and with integrity, for your integrity makes it so, and no adultery is found in you, for you are pure, with a blameless cloak.  Now do you even know where you have ascended to? But you are blind to height, not knowing whether you are on land, or high up the mountain, and so do not regard height. Now you go in the way of being respectful, respectful to men who deserve honour and respectful to an angel. Now the morning light comes to the mountain, soft light in the early morning, and there is indeed grass in some places and the shooting forth of plants that flower, and the scape of land is set out upon the Earth, and a cookfire burns and smoke rises up to the sky. Now early in the morning, the morning light shines upon the mountains and land and the hills of grass.

Now the battle-bow is not as the bow, for the bow is for hunting, and the war-chariot, not as the wagon or chariot, and the sling-stone, not usually lethal, and the catapult, often reckless and lethal, and the war-birds, lethal, for they are for soldiers, and every type of war-bird, and the travel-birds, not lethal.

Now the light rises over the land, Zion rises over the land, and the sun also rises, and is it Joshua Heyudu who is this sun that also rises? Now Zion was already there, and yet it rises more, and it settles upon the land, and it was already so, and it is light, and the light shines forth from the Earth, the Earth radiating light and covered in light, and the Zion Temple is for the High-Priest, who I call the Priest-King, and I council him to long, white robes, and a turban of a Priest-King, and the crowns are for him as a memorial, as a sign. Now a sceptre for him, also, for he rules as a High-Priest. Now let there be no other colours, red, or blue, in his robe, but if it is any colour required, let it be gold.



Now for council will you not be using gold where it is possible, and much gold, for Zion is not Greek, and splendour is doing well to the people.

--Letter to the Priest-King, from the angel of the covenant.


Now what has Nathan the prophet, called the book? But still, whether he called it so or not, it is the book of kings. Now as for Tamar and her brother, there are princes among you, that the wise know, that it not be offensive to others, for meddle not in the things of men and women in this regard, for much must unfold before things are right and settled.

Now over the rotten of the devil's kingdoms, and the rotten things that are gathered and scattered, so is Zion placed on top of  these things and Zion was already there. For what emerged from hell must return to hell, and what is wicked, it is diminishing and disappearing on its own, for they die on their own, these wicked things, and the time has passed for many things long ago. Now what has expired, it is dead and expired on the ground, and the Earth consumes it, it is already dead long prior, and what has not died upon a rotten tree, a poisonous tree, yet those things are able to be thrown down and trampled. Now the fire, I seek, to set upon that tree, that it is set ablaze, for with the rising of the sun, and the rising of Zion, so I wish for fire to take that tree. Now let them ignore the wickedness that has already vanished long ago, and the people may be able to celebrate, for the seal of Zorrobabel was opened. Now therefore, where is the god of Zion, the fellow of the Lord, the one who will be close to Him? Now would he, too, this fellow, not know the same, and he must be the type to know.

Now Saturn has given of seven rings to the Earth, and hundreds to the Earth, and not yet all, and of the seven rings, the seven eyes, and Saturn having the seven eyes, given to the Earth. Now to Joshua Heyudu, the seven eyes are given, also, by these books, in a fashion. Now they are able to seek wisdom, and more, and they have these books to be for them a thing upon the corner-stone, the Christ.

Now there is no hippie-action to be taken in some places, no hippie-ing to be done, for there is much in this time that goes beyond hippie-ing, the new generations wanting to be like the hippies, and the hippies I have no grievance with, and indeed have liked them, and yet the new generations have acted on blindness and feeling, as a wall before them, concealing their vision, and with feeling they have acted, and no understanding, that they go beyond being a hippie, to open the gate in many places for enemies of the nation. Now there is even that hippie, who goes beyond being a hippie, to be a terrorist, and he is only wicked and cowardly, even shedding blood of those who are moral, that he is not only rebellious then against violence, but he is then rebellious against morality, and God, for he is not with righteous zeal, but is with hate, envy, blood-shed, wrath, rebellion against morality, and this is beyond being a hippie, and he goes into terrorism, and is a danger to others in many directions.

Now the king who judges the miniscule is like the king who gives justice to the poor and equally to the rich, without favour or bias, that his throne will be established forever, and yet there is that miniscule grievance not worth hearing, for it asks of things that are not for the meddling of a king.

No soldiers of cities, declare not anarchy by failing to uphold the law and give justice to any, for they are left no choice but to act on their own, but faithful are they who keep their post.

Now an Adonijeh having no respect of society, in terms of the giving of wisdom and scholarly pursuits, that he rages at one as a criminal, and yet they are permitted, for they have a place as of a priest, he is against justice and wrathful in judgment, for he opens his mouth while standing upon lies, for the cause of righteousness, that he is in wickedness as far as he is righteous, and it was indeed only that he was of a religious cult, the narcissistic cult of Adonijeh, that declared Adonijeh righteous regardless of anything he did, and the only religion that was right before God, the Adonijeh-cult, that it was a religious grievance with which he rages with confidence and wrath, for his religion is offended, he reasons, and he is in great wrath, and another thing, valid, is against him. Now in this he declares himself king, and he does not respect society, and he is either as a religious terrorist, or a religious terrorist, and so then he is treasonous, in rebellion, and he deserves to die, and he does not perceive that he speaks against himself, for he rebels against the Lord, that the Lord is the giver of morality, truth, and justice. Now then if he rages against Solomon, who is in priestly pursuits, and it is because of the cult of Adonijeh, and this cult not also an offence to the angel. But if you are soldiers of cities, be not part of this Adonijeh-cult, but you are soldiers of the cities and loyal to society, that in some places only a few here and there have been of this cult who are soldiers of cities, and in some places, most have been of this cult, and this cult is evil and rebellious, for it need not be, and so then better are those soldiers of cities loyal to Solomon, that they do not claim any affiliation with Adonijeh, and in some places this has been so with the vast majority of these soldiers of cities, and in other places not so. Now an angel has right to give you advice, for by the books, there is the sign for you. Now the Christ would have been understood to be the son of God by what he fulfilled, His deeds, and all he had fulfilled, and there is no requirement of any prophecy to hear or read to have understood that it was so, and the angel has fulfilled deacon of the Earth, and he has even Shepherded, saying, I am not able to Shepherd you. Now all in Heaven must pay their dues, fulfilling, for this is the type of God you have, who is God, that all must fulfill and pay their dues, and the Christ has fulfilled more than any angel.

Now to the soldiers of cities, they too may rejoice for the rise of Zion that already was.

Now to the leaders of the meeting place may rejoice for the rise of Zion that already was, and their leader may rejoice, for he is able to speak with the angel without folly.

Now mighty of David, have I not come to you with a staff, and have I not also stood to be seen by your king? Now angels have fought with the mightiest of you in an ancient time.

Now to the god of Zion, the fellow of God, do you not stand equal to these, for they are a vast number, and you only one, and yet you stand as one of these. Yet you have not yet taken of the fruit, and if you do not, yet will I not look for another, and if there is then no god of Zion, so it will be there is none.

Now if any is a Sufi, that they are as an angel, David, Abraham, those of Ephriam which is like Abraham in a way, then they are then adding they are a Sufi of this thing, if they are telling others, that the devil might not be able to spread his killing wars of slave brutality over the Earth, as a cloud of iniquity and brutality. But an angel fulfills what is theirs to fulfill and perform, and what their way of life is, and what they are meant to do, only they can know of what the Lord asks of them to do, that the Lord is able to punish an angel, even, and yet only he has the right. Now the Lord has no servants who obey His will to attack an angel, or fulfill his will against any angel, and the devil has his servants to attack angels and fulfill his will, and an angel is considered a very great threat to the devil. Now there are indeed devil-worshippers, of devil-cults, and they are believing in all things, believing in angels, prophets, people of the Lord, that they place their hope in the devil, that he is actually able to win the war and save them, and they are desiring to please the devil, zealous for his will. Now these servants, they are another threat to angels, and they are able to poison, to infiltrate, and to kill. Now let not humans be ignorant of these things, for they are a threat to people as well, for they go to gatherings of the Lord's people, and they attempt to make it that children who please God will be slain, and they sow discord and slander, and tell many lies, and they are zealous to be wicked, to be as the devil on Earth.

Now for an adult, you who are women, if you did not mind your own business, it would be you would be sleeping with them, and their girl-friend, and they would not be as a child that incited your jealousy. For if any is sick of mind, and unwell in this way to not perceive them the first way, not perceiving reality, it is they are far more unwell than is perceived, and much confusion is with them in most things.

Now blessing be to you daughters, the elder or younger, both being young, both being women, for I offer you much justice of truth that you have much desired, having been robbed of your praise because of the foolishness and confusion, especially brought by the devil's shepherds. Now there has been the realm of order and chaos, and it is good that the middle-ground is kept in this, not being too orderly, to strangle the people, not being too chaotic, to bring about the things of abuse and calamity, and many types of evil, and it has been too far to chaos that you women have been robbed of your praise constantly, in almost everything, and you only have it in things not public, and there is no support for you in much, in terms of praise, and your prudence of wisdom and strategy, in this you are robbed of your praise, and all the things of beauty that you have done, for you have kept the roof of the Temple from collapsing as many of you have kept integrity while chaos unfolded and the words counselling foolishness were much, and they have blasphemed many beautiful things about you, as if hatefully, and the multitude of their blasphemies is too great, for in what you have had integrity, quickly a hateful spirit is blaspheming you, and none announced your wisdom, so that ignorance fell as darkness from the devil and his Shepherding when you kept with integrity, keeping with wisdom, to be wise women, and there has been mocking towards you in good things, and scorning towards you in good things, and you daughters who are young and you elder daughters who are young, you are beautiful, and as pillars before the Temple, surrounding the Temple, that hold up the Temple, and by your goodness, having kept to the Lord, believing in wisdom, keeping to wisdom and integrity, you have desired more judgment, and more truth and justice, because that which is good desires the light to shine upon it, that it may be known what beauty is there, and now so, Lucifer has said it, an angel, and in fact a young angel, and yet with what is in these books. Now here, perhaps, I interlope, and yet there must be praise, and who else was writing it, for he will withdraw from this.

Now the sign of Ashkelon and Ashdod I have seen, and what becomes of them I do not know.

Now the sign of Adonijeh I have seen, and what becomes of him I do not know.

Now the spirit of Las Vegas, she is not some ill thing, but she is sweet and kind, even if she is a prostitute, for she is not of the enemy, but is good and kind. Now as for what occurs in the city, I do not know.

Now stubborn and cruel are the spirits of some cities, as rusted metal without riches, as an aged metal that is sharpened and cruel.

Now Rome is mental unwellness, a kingdom of the devil, and Babylon, another kingdom of the devil, is more wicked. Now as for Pergamum, beauty and splendor is to it, and to the higher places of it, and the integrity of it, for where is the spirit of your place,  who is the woman who is the spirit of this place, the woman-spirit?

Now Damascus, who is the woman-spirit, who is spirit of your place? 

Sorghum, wheat, clover, and cotton are compatible with salt and are there not other plants that can be grown?

Now as for the moons of Saturn, let God do as He wishes. Now I have different names for each of these moons.

COMMERATION OF MARS AND THE SUN:
Now the sun also rises, indeed the Priest-King rises,
and he rises, too, as Zion rises,
Now Mars is member of Zion, the light of Zion goes forth like fire,
blessed light, that the Earth should shine,
now the god of Zion, he goeth round the sun,
around the light he goes,
for Mars is the god of Zion, and the knowledge
is for all,
that the sun also rises, and indeed the Priest-King the sun,
and the god of Zion, Mars he is,
and Saturn has seen, and Jupiter has testified,
and fear and panic an acceptable cult to him, Mars,
for they have as if prophesied of this,
that the Lord must have remembered these,
considered these before,
that the sky is having, things of Earth and more.




There is either too much violence in the world, or not enough.

Now you who judge, fear not man, and gain the praise of men, for by your regard of morality and truth, so you ignore the folly of the fools, and the righteous men regard you as having integrity.

Now if there is any who is an agent of an official thing and brings a false-report from envy or personal grievance against another, to make themselves king of what they are not king of, hi-jacking all of the power of organization, then this making themselves king is disloyalty, and shows treachory, that in their much slandering, what they would do not another, should be done to them, for where the slandering is clear and there is sufficient slandering of it, these are not as close to equals with the one they slander, but they perceive not that they are a base and wicked person, as a mocking and scorning dog that is wicked, as a dog and fool that has a demon and scorns and mocks the holy, for the other is perceived as almost equal and yet they are exceedingly better and more righteous than them, being greater in their good deeds and righteousness, for they are far apart. So then it is a base and wicked man, rebellious, who has rebelled against Solomon, and a prince, and the slander, whether there is opinion or not, is another matter, not concerning opinion, for it goes against loyalty and is a rebellion towards God. Now you who are bold in slander, and to hi-jack the power of a larger thing that is not yours, this bravery is not of righteousness but of wickedness, and if it is Adonijeh, in as much as he has not feared God, and not respected society, so you will not fear his prince-hood, that he is a son of David, for Solomon has said, when he would seize a symbol in that ancient time of being a king, to have a symbol of being king that he might gain a rebellion and sign that he was king before the people, that he will die, and indeed, also, when he is slandering Solomon that injustice should come to Solomon when he is in integrity, that in what he has slandered, so it will be added to him, the slander, that what proceeds from him as slander, so it will be laid to the slanderer as if truth, and what punishment will be for that, so he may be judged by it, for he makes himself a false-king, that he lays charges of what is slander, to seize the power of a greater thing than him. Now the slanderer betrays, and the group of them that slander, they break away and the divide appears between them and what they were members of, that they are rogue, and they are traitors, for as it is by Mala, so it is in Ria, for Mala is truth and influences Ria, and is more true than Ria, for where Ria does not then alter to what is Mala, then Ria is a lie in this thing, and is ignorant and unjust. Now there was much ignorance upon the Earth, that injustice was not comforming Ria to Mala, that it was injustice, and it was ignorant matter, darkness, and it mattered not, and it was ignorant weight and weight of darkness, and the injustice of it fought, and yet Mala remained, untouched by the injustice, for Mala could not be moved back even a little, and what was true in Mala was the truth. Now if any says, we do not regard Mala, and the Lord, who is God, who created us, does not God know it? Does He not consider it? Now I looked and it was too big for me, and yet the Lord was taking vengeance in uncountable places upon the Earth, and people did not perceive or see, and He was taking vengeance in ways they could not see, and they were made simple in this thing by stories of clear violence, that they did not perceive the Lord's vengeance, and He was punishing people for injustice against others and His vengeance was faithful, and yet it was too big for me, and He was stripping people of good, and robbing them, and He was making low and demoting, and He was causing some affliction, and some lied, not liking it to be known what the Lord did, that they showed forth deliberately that it was going well with them, that they hid the punishments that the Lord was giving to them.

Now Saturn has said of Titan, indeed now I know that it was a different thing than what occurs among humans, in their careless ways, that it is a greater thing, that if Titan has perceived the greatness, and she has remained with integrity more so than the mere people would do in these reckless and foolish days, than she will be Titan still, and because it is a greater thing than me, yet I must obey the Lord, so that if Titan has not had this integrity another will take her place, and she will be Titan, and her name will be known, and the other, having never been so to be Titan, for it is greater than me, and I must obey God.

Now then what will Titan be? But it decides many things with a special consideration, concerning Saturn, for and the eyes of truth are given to the Earth, and yet the rings remain around Saturn in spirit, for they are in Jupiter, and Jupiter is given to the Earth, for the rings have gone out, one-thousand, being light, and the rings are given to all the Earth, that every person on Earth should be given these things to read. Now let these things then go to Mars, and Mars gives it to the people and takes the profit, for Mars has purchased the rings from Saturn, for Mars has purchased Jupiter.

Now the children of angels, computer hackers, you are right to be jealously defending your domains, for the Lord is jealous, and as you are defending the freedoms that are right, so it is of great benefit to religion, and to Zion, that you are defending your domain. For if they are calling you jealous, it is good, this jealousy, and right, and God is jealous, for you need not repent, but only some may need to repent of repenting in this thing, that all those of angels must be defending their domains for the sake of the Lord and kingdoms, and it is showing yourselves good when you do so. Now your realm, it is as a realm of the heavens, a realm of Heaven, that you call the computer realm and the internet, and you have your own names and language for these things, that you are children of the orphanage, and it is a thing of Heaven, and beings from Heaven have used technology, as is written about in Ezekiel, and what your destiny is, your future, even the angel does not know. Now there are the ghost-hunters, the hackers, and there is another thing, another of the children of angels that is not having to be either of these things, that three groups I have found who are children of angels, and they are called men and women by people. Now I do not tell you what to do, or what is of importance, for I do not know of what things are of importance, in any specific way.

Now if any is Adonijeh, and not Adonijeh as in the soldiers of cities, but more so Adonijeh, to speak with his mouth, yet he has no right to speak against the children of angels, any of them, for the Lord has created him, and they are not even Solomon, but are associated with angels. Now the children of angels are not part of his realm that he is in, and they are beyond him, that he has no right to blaspheme and slander in his accusations, for he will go no further than Solomon in his rebellion, that by Mala a noose for his neck, for he speaks against what is higher, that integrity has claimed he should be kind to these, unless it is to be against bitterness and iniquity, or some wickedness. Now even still, diamonds have flaws, and it is not flaw yet, for it is not within the realm of iniquity and bitterness, or wickedness, that it is nothing, and a person, and an iron rod is good when it is good, that with competence is an iron rod, when it is good and Shepherding without what is true offence. Now the angel gives honour unto the child of angels, of the orphanage, who is even kingly in a fashion among them, and regards him, and the angel knows that they speak iniquity, trembling with nearer the number of the beast, when they are slandering the harmless and innocent, as if they are greatly wicked and evil, for there are times when to do injustice against innocence is getting the number of the beast, that is is unnatural for humans, and outside of the realm of humans, whether very wicked or not to be doing any wickedness against innocence, for the lions would not even touch the person of Daniel, because of innocence, and so who will do wickedness to the innocence itself?

Now for what is not acceptable to the realm of men: to those who have been of Joab, to be part of him, he is a soldier, and not one of the soldiers of cities, and so it is good, if I may give you advice, to be keeping with David, the soldiers, and not going with the soldiers of cities and their cult-religions and foolishness that is unclean. Now for this sin Joab was upheld by Solomon, that he not fall, but die and ascend before the alter, being righteous, with both hands upon the horns, that he was more of a man then mere men, and he ascended there unto the Lord, to Heaven, for Solomon would not let him fall, to become wicked and coward and be what would be worse than death for him, for Joab chose instead to die rather than to flee to Egypt or some other nation, and he was able to do so if he had chosen it. So he kept his righteousness, indeed gained it more, and what had been for a short time hypocrisy for him, that David judged him guilty of blood in two things in which he had not been guilty, so he was not judged again of being wicked in these two things anymore, for by treason he was become wicked and covered in condemnation, that the blood of these two things was upon him, and by choosing that he should not flee, he was again not guilty, for he was not a hypocrite, and he gained even more of his righteousness, and kept his righteousness, that he ascended before the alter.

Now who is launching war to defend others, and he or she is actually only jealous, that they launch war? Now who is going further to launch war when those they defend do not want defence? Now if the devil is going further to defend people against God yet the Lord has accepted them, and desires good for them, and peace for all, and the devil, chaos and confusion, that there be more bullying, violence, and wars upon land.

Now the sun also rises, and Zion glows, for it has already been, and glows so that the Earth glows, and it has shone forth from all places, and it nothing is heard of them, if it is so pleasing those who are the strong hand, of the heaps of Orcs, the devil's people, who are gathered up and lead by Gandalf, the grey, for he chooses neither light nor darkness, and so chooses darkness, that they should desire to break apart the people and they be cast again into confusion and wars with each other, and the disrespect and bullying. Now Saruman has mentioned Zion, and it is the Lord's, and it has come about the Christ, who died, that He came to die, first Elijah to die, and then the Christ, who fullfilled all, and the thing is completed and the Earth is filled up with Zion, and there is another great awakening, and the Earth glows with light and the Zion Temple may be built, and the Priest-King, ruling more than sea to sea and to the river, but all of the Zion that pertains to the Zion Temple, for his domain does not go into the domain of the Muslims, for the Muslims have their sacred cities. Now his domain, again it is written, does not go into the domain of the Muslims, for the Muslims have their sacred cities, and in this realm of Muslims, is also found the angel, and yet the angel has followed Christianity, indeed, he believes in all the Bible, the Old Testament and New, and believes  all the Quran is true.

Now the Lord has said to Abraham that he will be the father of many nations, and yet not all that has Abraham as father is valid, and if the Lord is having more children by Abraham, or is bringing forth more children, yet I give council that you only wait until the Lord has done it, that it is then identified, and then developed to what extent it should go. Now as for the Hebrew Jews, at this time, if they would dwell ever among others, they must admit that the Lord has other children.

Now them who start conflicts are engaged in conflicts, and those who contend when there is no cause and effect, these are an abomination to the Lord's.

Now the Priest-King of the Zion Temple, his domain does not go into the domain of Muslims, for Muslims are not his domain, for Muslims have their sacred cities. Now Muslims, too, are Zion, that they are what the angel has called middle-east, west.

Now Epram, or Ephrom, and Ephriaham, I have had much of as a caterpillar, and and yet Babylon gives a helmet of steel, a purity of the house of purity and false-truth, and it gives Assyrian things, the purifying of wholesomeness by torture, that is seeks to cleanse humanity from the Earth, people, and yet Babylon is not clean, but has false-purity, false-truth, and it is exceedingly wicked, cleansed in the lake of fire, for the spirit goes to the fire and is cleansed of iniquity and the lake of fire burns as bright as the sun, and some of the people return as torturers who seek to make clean by torture that they are against what is wholesome and right.

Now in time the volcano erupts, and who has done evil to it? But it buries towns in ashes, it makes the fields unusable, and it clears all the space around it. Now by too much pressure, does not lava rise, the magma chamber rise, and it pours out from a height, it would seem, and spumes out acidic rain upon the people, and lava goes down the slopes and sets fire to trees and the Earth shakes, and the animals flee, and the people depart and new stones are found on land and the light is obscured from the sky, and the land is given darkness about it, and the place close to it is uninhabitable. So is the rising up of hell from the Earth, that the Earth shakes and trembles and darkness spumes out over the land, and close by is acidic rain, and the falling of fiery rocks, and the hell comes up as lava, and spreads over the land, and it gives rocks for stoning to death, for the doctrine of the devil, and his kingdom, for the stoning of the good and righteous, that by the devil's kingdom the righteous should be stoned, and the land is made uninhabitable and there is poison everywhere, and the hot springs of comfort are made deadly, and scorch the flesh, and the climate is covered in clouds of poison, and the Earth opens in places to consume. Now as it happens in Ria, so too, it can happen in Mala in some places. Now at those times, if you are to go into the hot-springs of comfort, they are dangerously hot, and melt the flesh. Now the rock that turns to molten, returns to rock again, and again the grass will grow and animals will be upon the Earth, and gardens and growing things.

Now what God regards as poisoning is not by the lies of wickedness that are with Babylon and the evil of this time, but all poisoning, does he not regard as poisoning? Now those who would harm innocence, they are often obtaining the number of the beast, if it is by poison, that they are for doing wickedness to innocence.

Now fruit comes from the tree, and there are many trees, and many bringing forth fruit, and each person is themselves, a tree, and some trees loose their leaves in the cold and yet when summer comes, the leaves return, and some birds flee the cold and yet when the summer comes they are returned, and a butterfly will go far to escape a storm, and yet a moth flies directly into a fire.

Now a butterfly will land lightly upon some, and it is peace, are they not gently watching it float away? But if a moth lands upon any, is it not good that a cat kills it? Now the angel is not meaning to offend any who are good if he lands gently upon any. 

Now armies have advanced when there is scarce necessities, and Locusts turn to armies when there is drought.

Now ants remove them who would spread decease, that they may live or die, and if they live, they may return. Now they have no leader, no companion, and they know what is wise, and diligently they build an empire, for those who build out of the way of people, these are able to build a great thing, but those who build close to people, their empire is swept away.

Now that which starves a parasite, giving it not good or bad, the parasite dies quickly.

Now that which knows how to give what is poisonous to a parasite, is able to kill the parasite quickly.

Now good is given for good, and peaceful dealings bring about the continuation of peace that goals may be achieved.

Now there is a man bothering none, barely noticed, who gets by with very little, another who eats eats only plants, being peaceful, who is not bothered, and yet when peace is vanishing they are starved and disappear, for another kingdom comes, and they have nothing.

Now the wines of the Lord, that have no fear for them, and they come from land, that they are good, indeed let there be more of these wines.

Now some of those of the crowded cities, the young men, there was grain for them, and life was happening, and too there was grain for the young men in the rural areas, and the young women were searching for the new wine, for was this not Eretz Chadrack? Now there are places of fields and forests and the tender barns and the valley rivers and there are places of Mountains that are high, and there are places of shores and ships. Now for what cause does any resent this land, for no reason, that they hate this land when they have come to set foot upon it? But the fields are laid out upon the land, and the mountains rise, and the people like jewels in a crown, and holy stones. Now does any love wickedness and foolishness? But is the land resented by the devil? Now there are places good, and places with much evil, and there are places that have gathered up the evil, and the churches of the devil, some of them have known of one who pleases God, even of an angel, for they are much upset and tumultuous within at the presence of an angel, and are not these the same who commune with demons, who learn the wickedness and folly that is wisdom in the devil's kingdom's, that their hearts are worshipping the devil and in fear of him, and the hearts of the Lord's people, are having fear of God, and are in the truth.

Now the calamity of a slave has been void of understanding and prudence, and they dwell under the Earth, but those of righteousness and faith, trusting in God, they are in a sure thing.

Now those who who love blasphemy, to do wickedly and then praise God, they do so against their own life.

Now by a good thing, when it comes, fulfilled, peace and goals may continue, and yet he who panics and offers up his gain to another who is greater by Mala, does not the Lord see the thing done in Mala, and can he not fulfill what you have done if you do so in your envy and hate?

Now those who fulfill right, repenting by deeds, these walk in a sure thing, with understanding, but a wicked man, in foolishness.



ABOUT SLAVES:

Now there is them who desire fame by doing evil, that they might have fame, and then wealth, and it is a pursuit of the desperate, and those who are wicked, do they not love this? But the wise hate evil.

Now them who desire fame by evil, they are a foolish brute who brings sorrow, that they are perverse and a thing of sin, a narcissist who was jealous, them being neither male or female, and that if they are adding to it, great anger towards the smallest slight, that they should be respected beyond that anyone should speak, indeed a brutal and cruel slave, a god, and a worthless thing of sin, desiring praise by the deeds of their jealousy. 

Now where some have slain an innocent, indeed the animals are for praising them, and they sin against their own lives in that they praise, for they move stones within them, indeed the earth shakes in them, the soil is loosened, the soil is cut and divided, the rocks beneath the Earth shift, that they move them by motive of their jealousy and envy, for they have hated life and the life of their neighbour, being hateful against them, even against their own nation, hating the symbol of that which goes forth and the purity of the symbol, for this is too what they hate, for the devil's kingdoms have not come, that Ephrehaim has not done it, and rebellion towards the nation has not gone in that way, but it is corruption, that they are preferring the devil's kingdoms, and hating the life of people, of all those with integrity, and the life of them who abide with integrity, that they exalt the slaying of the good in times of peace or war, and it bullies and afflicts the living, and they go in the way of blood-shed and the shifting of rocks.

Now where one slays, and clearly jealous, believing in their clear jealousy that they will be praised and get fame, this is a slave. For he throws away most of his perception, circumcising himself that he may not perceive, offering himself the opposite of reality in many things, so much as is required, weeping within himself from jealousy, that he has thrown away his perception, having never seen something so much greater than him before, and weeping within himself because of the love that is towards another, that he offers himself the opposite of the truth, for he has brainwashed himself, indeed, he has placed the opposite of truth in himself because of his great efforts because of his jealousy, for he reasons he will be rewarded, when he has brainwashed himself, and thrown away his perception, for lies and false-understanding he has given to himself, from his weeping within himself from jealousy, and to the popular, he says, they are not popular, to the beautiful, they are hated, to the wise, they are foolish, and likewise in this manner he has circumcised himself, not seeing any longer, fractured and perverted within, having shifted stones into many pieces that he is a thing of deliberate sculpting and corruption, for by his great jealousy, he has mutilated himself repeatedly, mutilation upon mutilation, and he is brutal and without understanding, void of even nothing, less than nothing, for he has made great effort to believe many lies, a slave of slaves, a slave who has become a killer, a brutal and void thing, consumed with jealousy and envy, for also he is a sycophant, hating beauty, for have not slaves said, yet beauty and popularity, it is not popular, and they hate beauty, and popularity they hate, and wisdom they hate, and ability they hate, and nobility they hate, and bravery they hate, and integrity they hate, and morality they hate, for the brutality and cruelty of slaves says, slaves are popular, and people, men and women, they are weak fools, easily crushed. Now the lives of slaves are meaningless, and they indoctrinate themselves constantly because of their great jealousy and envy, that they tell lies to each other continuously, as encouragement, for they do not like to perceive reality in any thing, for in their cowardliness, they like that they are strong, and in their wickedness, they like that they are strong, and in their violence, that they are strong, and in their ignorance, that they are popular, for slaves are with slaves, and they are not male or female, and none considered bad is as a slave, and none considered humble, for the humble are pure and weak to them, and the bad, they are considered helpless and weak, for the slave is iniquity, their whole self is brutal and cruel, and in summary, they are wanting to believe the opposite of the truth in everything, for this is the summary, and it is because of jealousy, that they are the devil's, and him they worship. Now the bastard is not a slave, that they are not brutal enough, and are considered weak, and the bad is not a slave, that they are not brutal enough, and are considered weak, and the soldier is not a slave, that they are not brutal enough, and are considered weak, and the very mighty soldier is not a slave, that they are not brutal enough, and are considered weak. Now take a chain, and device, for only the slave wrangler is able to deal with such, for there may indeed be a day when you will wish for peace in society that you give the slave wrangler the chain and metal device.

END OF SECTION.

Now though the High-Priest, the Priest-King is not as high as an angel, yet is he not the sun that rises? Now if he is accepting these things, he will be garbed in long, white robes, and given the turban of a Priest-King, and he will have a sceptre, and the seven eyes he will have, and he will build the Temple. Now will they not give to the Temple, as tithe offering, that the Temple may be built, and it be given what is necessary? 

Now a stone does not yield much tithe, or is it not so? But if they are asked, do they give? Now they are for walls and defence.

Now if two parts of you who are chosen, are being cut off within you that they die, and the third part remaining, I do not know, or if two parts are dying of the people, I do not know, for I am not a prophet, and would a prophet know? But when the angel seized the spirits of the devil's people, indeed they bucked him, and he seized again and they bucked him off and said strangely, and even blasphemed, for he seized their spirits to speak what he said, and their spirits were not obedient to speak as he had said. Now if this was so with them, then what was the case of people the Lord may have chosen to prophecy, whether they would say exactly as they were supposed to or not, regardless of themselves?

Now because of the wars, yet it is not seeming that America can be the place of the Temple, and yet there are places across the border, easily accessible to Americans, and there is indeed a water-fall called Niagra, and there are towns close to it and there are many and there are many historical sights in this area and is it not likely that Americans will be coming day by day along with other people to the Temple? Now there are mainly seven, and one of these is two, the Christian Sufism and Sufi Islam and the atheist in another, and yet they are not believing, by what they are, and so it is possibly not considered right by them or others that they have any symbols for them, or signs in the Temple. 

--Letter to the High-Priest of the Zion Temple, from the angel of the covenant.

Now does not Ekron walk now with God, keeping to the integrity of His ways? Now there is Ham, the true heir, and Hammath, also the true heir, and Ekron, does he not now walk with God? Now Edom, it is a thing of no religion and yet religion, not the keeping of the Old or New Testament, and it is sickly and ill, not as Eden, but is it not desiring to be closer to Eden? Now I would council against Edom, and the Old and New Testament are better, and as for Ham, he is considerate, and as for Hammath, he is considerate, and Ekron, too, he walks with righteousness and understanding, for he regards God and is for what is right. Now what is meant by the true heir? But the leader is more likely to rightly be Hammath, especially, or Ham, and yet who knows what God will do?

Now will there not come a time, when the time is right, that those guided by wisdom will seek to aid Hammath and Ham in being leader of the dark shade? For wisdom is with both of these, and indeed when the time comes, when another comet passes possibly, and when the valley is reached, then the wise might seek to establish peace for him and aid in being king, both Hammath and Ham, and it should then cease that every person of the dark shade should be insolent to assume themselves as representative of their people, each of them assuming themselves king of their people when they wish in their chaos, and insolence should then cease that they bypass their king to be representative in what they wish for their people, for the sceptre should be with Hammath and Ham, and indeed it is for men of the fair shade to give it, that those whose hearts are for it, that they wish to give it, these are those who are right to be giving it, and Hammath and Ham will have their land, by Mala, and so I am believing it to be right, and Ekron honoured as a people who walk with God, and with integrity, for Ekron has his domain, also, among the people, and there are pools that are with Hammath and Ham, spread out and in his domain, gatherings of water, and it is a sacred thing, and he may walk among ruins, of glory, and bring new buildings and glory in his time, when it is well to do so. Now there will not be such disorder, that his people are bypassing him, and speaking for all their people, when he is king of them, and there will not be such chaos, that each is wandering from place to place, being with any group they wish of the dark shade, that each of these groups should be considered the primary group, that also bypasses Hammath and Ham. Now Hammath and Ham are much higher than them, and indeed he is beyond them, and they should not have the arrogance of Beelzebub, that I have found in them, that they should be arrogant and evil against the sceptre of Hammath and Ham, for does not Beelzebub rebel against him from his own people, for that brutal and mean, old man, he goes even about among the dark shade to rebel against Hammath and Ham, and does Beelzebub not encourage in his arrogance, in and arrogant way, to encourage rebellion, that none should repent? Now the sceptre is already with Hammath and Ham, that I do not mean that any men of the fair shade give it, for God gives what He gives, but that men of the fair shade, when the time is right, give support to Hammath and Ham in having rule, that the rebellious among him be greatly unable to rebel against him, for he is exalted as king, and those of Ekron's domain, not the kings of them, they too will be able to know that Hammath and Ham are the primary, the kings. Now wisdom is with these, both Hammath and Ham, and they are both considerate. Now it is not wrong for me to be writing of this, in what way I write, although it is not seeming my domain, but in what I go into it, it is not wrong, for I do not interlope in this, and it is right. Now because it is not my domain, they are not my flock, and I do not Shepherd them, and indeed I have not even begun to, and it is as if councils of peace to them.

Now there are fools, not taking serious things seriously, and their serious actions they do not take seriously, that the cost of lives is nothing to them, for they are for the land of child-hood, and they do not perceive when they go out to die.

Now as for the slaves who are Ham's and Hammath's, indeed many of them, without the profane meaning of the word, are jack-ass demons in many ways, and prostitutes of the enemy rise up to defend the noble and good among the dark shade, being also that these prostitutes are slaves and defend the worthy from Zion, being atheistic or not, and not respecting society, so that they blaspheme people and the Lord, being as Harrods to oppose what is holy, even, the holiness of learning, and respecting not society in all the separation of priests, who are scholars, that even here these prostitutes and slaves have been exceedingly ignorant and without the dignity of people, that projection comes from their mouths, and they are brutal in iniquity, profaning what is sacred, and all of it in the defence of those of the dark shade who are noble and worthy, that they defend him, as if jealousy, against Zion, and his blessing and inheritance, and defend against the Lord, that they seek to cut him off from his blessing and what is good, to cut him off quickly from Zion, and it is indeed because of themselves that they do so. Now then is it not good that Hammath and Ham are given the sceptre by support, that those who rightfully have the sceptre and given it by support of those who are good, for if a prostitute is jealous possessive of the noble and worthy, indeed on that day, none need have regard of her as a person if she blasphemes and bullies when there is good and respect, for if none is pitying the noble and worthy, indeed why will any seek to defend her? But she claims all of the dark shade, and she represents herself as king of all of them all, the dark shade, and representative of them all. But in her lack of respect for society, in that she does not fear God, indeed she is not worthy of being considered one of the dark shade, but is a prostitute of the enemy among them, and also to others, for projection comes from her, and she is void of understanding. Now she knows not any, and knows herself, that she speaks with emptiness, and though she may walk with another of the dark shade, as if they are brother, indeed she is a slave and the other a person. Now if she will be impious to use the name of a person, indeed the just recompense is that her mouth shall be placed on a rock ledge, her biting the rock ledge, and a person will stomp upon the back of her head. For this is the just recompense for her blasphemy, and only towards a man who is of people, and not even a holy man. Now I give religion, that you know you are not permitted to do this thing.

Now what is of Solomon is of Solomon, what is of the Emporer is of the Emporer, and what is of the angel is of the angel. 


Now then the priest-hood does well by Ham and Hammath, and yet by Beelzebub he does very wrong, and the arrogance of Beelzebub is found in many places, and it encourages the good against repentance, that he would lead them away from any repentance when the times are for it, and his mouth mocks and scorns and he is found from women as well as men, and in all people he is found, for he is an old man, brutal and mean, incredibly wicked, and does he not lay upon places, the spirit of the devil, that he might attack with many voices and all his house that he is able to bring? But have the people of his house not gathered up abject types, and some of them have rebelled against the word of the Lord, and have chosen that they should follow the devil, having hope in him to give victory, that they prefer wickedness, and they learn even to take the number of the beast, which is not a thing of humans, for people do not do it, and what is off limits, even for wickedness, they attack, that there is nothing to slay with guile, for they attack what is innocent, that they get the number of the beast, in their sicophantry and their wickedness, for if hell is before the righteous, how much more close is it to the wicked, and yet even the wicked do not stumble into it. Now then when a person is attacked with cowardliness, how is it they are blameless if it comes about they are attacked in a way that outside of what humans are dealing with, that so as the thing is outside and beyond what humans are having to deal with, and they blaspheme in defence and attack, they do not receive the number of the beast. Now rely on the Lord in this thing, who who are pure and blameless, you who are for good, who are desiring that you should attain Heaven, who are wanting to be good, for there are wicked beasts about, and the devil even goes about as a lion, though wicked in deeds and words, and the Earth is not in the grey, in the luke-warm place they seemed to claim, for there is great good and great wickedness on Earth, and so as some have gone to great good others have gone to great wickedness, and some have secretly loved the devil, and desire to be more wicked during their time on Earth, that they cast away all hope that is in the Lord, of eternal life, and prefer instead the things of disgust and desecration and all the wickedness they will indulge in, and going so far, their heart worships and the devil in hope, and they drink of the wines of the lake of fire, and eat the meat of wickedness, of rebellion and disgust, for iniquity is sweet to their lips and to their tongue, and it brings about satisfaction to the belly, and the wine of blood-shed, it is pleasant and sweet to them, and desecration is pleasing to them, indeed to desecrate all that is beautiful and holy.

So then there have been things written about Sodom and Egypt, and the slime that is Sodom, and sycophantic are these and brutal and with wickedness, and yet Eretz Chadrack, it may be holy and good.

Now there is that which I called the dola sickness and it is low intelligence that seeks to kill the very intelligent person, and it is like a re-occurring impulse that those with the sickness seem to not be aware of.

Now some are insolent, and beyond hearing anything, for there is no repentance considered ever for them, not even a moment, and they are holding themselves always beyond reproach, that even in peaceful fashion, that does not provoke, there is no consideration of repentance for them. Now repentance comes at many times, and it comes more frequently for some, and there are many calls to repentance when something is heard and considered, and yet Beelzebub encourages with arrogance and mocking that none should ever repent. Now those who blaspheme repentance, and even say, why does none repent, it is blasphemy of calls to repentance and repentance.

Now those who act to hurt emotionally, Heaven knows not the term, but it is called spiritual war-fare, that those who engage in it are exited any conflict of humans, and are then engaged in this thing that is war between Heaven and hell. Now where any devises that which is intended to hurt a person spiritually, it is in the war of Heaven and hell, that here are those are having the devil as their lord, and they devise wickedness, being as terrorists, but in spiritual war for the devil. Now let them then remain on their own side, and not be offended and come into the camp of the holy, for those who do so, they are deserving the battle-bow to be used towards their back.

Now she who slays herself, it is not vengeance, for she takes iniquity to her, and makes herself a brutal slave to an early degree, that she is cut off, for she infuses herself with iniquity and rebellion, that she sells her soul to slavery, to be a slave before God, and imagines that the truth is other than what it is, for the Lord is against him who would sell his blessing for a meal, and there is one who sells more than their blessing when they have not truly been offended. Now confusion is bringing it, and it makes the mind iron, and the prostitute has victory over her.

Now what should I then say when it is time? But the devil has a right to claim some lives, for he desires to take them to hell, to mutilate them, and he is having the right, is he not? Now do not some of them rejoice on land, and yet what time is left for these who rejoice at wickedness against the Lord's people?

Now then the time of foolishness and confusion I declare, without victory, to be at an end, for only the wiser will remain, and them the people, and the bastards, that those who go to slay themselves, to be taken by the devil to be mutilated, there will be no mourning for them or their foolishness, for they relented and chose wickedness and evil, and they were not even attacked, and none had tried much to slay them, and yet for those who are for fighting the war when the battles come, let them be supported and these we care for greatly.

Now when you are defeating the slaves of Hammath, Ham, and Ekron, indeed you are supporting them, especially Hammath and Ham, for if those who carry the pale of water in the house-holds of the dark shade, the servants of them, and slaves of them, are coming out to wage war as if their people, claiming kingship of all their people, as if representatives, there is indeed discord being sown, that the devil by wickedness and injustice, seeks to endanger the kingdoms of Hammoth, Ham, and Ekron, and there is sign of wickedness and disorder in it, for they are as if scattered and in chaos, each doing as pleases them, and some are even waging war against God on behalf of their people. Now Hammoth does not need to attempt to wrangle his people, for he is the rightful king, and the slaves of him revolt in this way: they bypass him in almost all things, and claim they are kings of the people, and they cause war and discord with other people. Now I do not have to ask permission to do this service for Hammath, for the Earth is the Lord's and the Universe, that I will clear his domain of rebellion and treason if it is so good, for I am not a man, and not of the sons of Noah, and indeed I am a burden to meddle in these things, because I am not a man. Now I do not attempt to sow discord, and yet where I am considered unwelcome, as if a vexation, indeed I am glad because they consider me such, for they are well, I believe, when they think of me as a vexation that I should meddle in any way between the shades. Now then what is the serving woman, who is slave of them? But she goes with the devil, to be her lord, for she acts in contradiction to Hammath's power and kingship to do as if war and discord without receiving permission, that she is one who says, I will begin war with allies, for my iniquity hates the Lord, and the people I am slave to, that I will be a false-flag against the people I am slave to. Now throw away pety defences that discredit the dark shade, for when there is kingdoms established, from respect, none will use the word 'racism' as if they are a victim, giving up battle before any has won when there is only contention. But no stranger, who is not a slave, need respect the clear slave of the dark shade, or regard them as a real flag of their people, for it is clear they are a slave of the dark shade, and their folly is apparent. Now who will then blame the dark shade for the behaviour of a slave to them?

Now if any slave to the dark shade says, I am a mother, in their brutality and insolence, it is likewise as for ignorant fools who are women among the fair shade, that they rebel, and the slave of  to the dark shade, against their king, that they claim kingship of the dark shade, and the foolish woman, in her folly, among the fair shade, if she is a mother, she is not mothering her children where she is, for her children are elsewhere, and she is departed from them, that where she is, she is not a mother there, and disgraceful she is in their lack of understanding and her lack of respect for society, for she makes herself as an ugly swine, and jewel in the nose of a swine when she is not respecting society, though she says I am a mother. Now if she is being ignorant, and offended by what is holy and against, she is making herself as a swine and a jewel in a swine's snout, and she eats of swine in this, and dwells in the strength and power of the swine's house. Now she who has put her truth and confidence in the power and strength of the swine's house, puts her faith and confidence in ignorance and foolishness, ignorance to shame, and yet a swine is not ashamed to be found there, but respect and honour is to the woman who walks in wisdom. 

Now the swine house has been built by the residue of propaganda for war, what they call false-liberal, and it has been against Islam, and then moves from there to be against religion. Now the Priest-King would be blameless of all of this, not having any role in what was produced.

Now I am a phoenix of flame, a wielder of truth and light, and yet a Chief angel I am not, and I give what I give, and my principality comes like Elijah, like the Christ, and I am indeed not knowing all the angels know, and know what I know, and I have considered by representative, the grand-daughter of Christ, if he had a grand-daughter, for I have sought out what I seek, and the devil has given me resistance.

Now I know that Titan will not be, unless it has been wise, and keeping with greater integrity than many, for it will cease to be Titan and yet Titan remains, and there then must be another who is Titan. Now as for the other moons, the principle being seven, and six more aside from Titan, I am not even able to tell who these are and if I have ever met any. Now then let them be named and their names recorded if they are indeed discovered, for the wise may have want to know of them in the future.

Now what occurs with the moons of Jupiter, and the angel is not Jupiter, for will not the wise take interest to know? Now nine principle moons are with Jupiter.


Now on the third day: the bringing forth of the people of Zion, for the Christ arose on the third day.

Now on the fourth day: the sun, Mars, and the lights in the sky.

Now the third day has been a little over two-thousand years, and how long a day will be, I do not know, for the Lord is light and does He not decide the days?

Now I desire for the fourth day to begin, and if it is the Lord's will, and Him willing for it, then I am pleased, and I am not know what the Lord's will is, only that I desire for the fourth day to come.

Now it is not normal for women to believe in nihilism and to be nihilistic, but what they do and say, they will have to bear it, that they not harass any.

Now there is that woman who hates men, and yet she is being with a man, and deceptively, for she does not tell him that she hates men and him, that she then goes about to do what is actions of hate and disrespect towards him, and he has not done any wickedness. Now if it is then not the judgment of God, it is the judgment of the devil, and the women of wisdom and integrity, having the light and the truth, and all types of justice with them, they are sister to him, and some wife.

Now I shepherd in some things to make way for Hammoth and Ham, that they are afflicted even more by what any of the fair shade or slightly darker shade is afflicted by, that when they are in chaos, each doing as pleases them, there is no king among them, and he is not seen much, for they are seen more than him in the chaos. Now the slaves of him are exploiting the disorder and being brazen and obnoxious to bypass him, and yet do they not know that they are bypassing their king? Now I do not seek to be a meddle-some burden, and yet is there not peace between the principle ones, Hammoth, Ham, and even Ekron, and the fair shade? Now Ekron now walks with God, and Hammoth and Ham, were they not always the principle ones? But Beelzebub has inhabited many places among the dark shade, and he bypasses Hammoth and Ham, and he brings chaos and calamity, all types of foolishness, and yet those who have integrity, who have kept with integrity, are they not hated by the slaves of him, and the slaves can be dangerous, and the good are called of the fair shade, and other things, and they seek to bully because of integrity, that the one who deserved honour is given dishonour because they have gone into wickedness, and are too wicked to give honour to those who deserve honour, that they hate those with integrity.

Now regard not the nihilistic woman who believes in the just-world, for it is foolishness. Now it is not normal for a woman to be fooled by this, as being who she is, that she does not perceive always the foolishness of the just-world concept, that the woman is in the truth when she is not deceived by this. Now first there is the gain in Mala, and then the things are upon land, on Earth, that it should be on land as it is in Mala.

Now there is the woman for a man, and she discerns the man she loves, even if she has not yet met him, that there are women who have been thought odd from the people, and yet they have desired a man who is more like God. Now there is much order found on Earth beneath the layers of foolishness and chaos, and the house is made right by the woman, and she builds the house when she has inhabited it, indeed there are some already building it before they have inhabited it, and there are those women who are building the people, and supporting the people, that the concerns of women are many, and they are not selfish, indeed, the opposite, that they care for the things that men care for, the same things, and not things concerning only women, but the things that concern all the people.

Now the woman who hates her husband, but not men, if she commits adultery it is not to disrespect him, for she goes about such in secrecy. Now she is captive of marriage, and yet if there is indeed no love, there should be talk about divorce, that adultery not occur. Now the woman is temporarily alienated from her husband, she should talk to him about divorce, that she be reconciled to him, if she has been alienated from him, rather than to commit adultery, for those women who commit adultery, they are in different circumstances than her, for not all adultery is the same, and a woman who is married to a man who desires men, who acts upon it, it is not the same as the woman who is alienated from her husband temporarily. Now keep with truth, you who are women, and understanding, and if you are considering, you must then marry who you are in love with, or else become captive, and it is not right to willingly go, for the snares of iniquity come with tidings of peace, that peacefully they say, go into marriage when you are in love with another, and yet it is not actually done, and the foolishness has been shown to you that people do what they do not actually do, and there is much foolishness shown that people do not actually do. Now if they peacefully persuade women to even their ruin in many things, and their loss of all that is true riches and blessing, then again, it is good that women are always keeping to truth, as if stubbornly, with integrity, that they not be deceived, and they know the hate of those who seem peaceful, that they council ignorance, and are made up with hate and transgression. Now such stubbornness reveals the servants of the devil, for the stubbornness of integrity of a woman shows them for what they are, and they cannot harm you, wise woman, and yet where a knife is required for a woman, or a battle-bow, indeed should they not be able to have it and use it, for will not the angel know of the wickedness of some? Now if they then pressure, yet there are times when a woman must accuse them, for if wicked men bully, indeed they are the same as slanderers and those with knives and poison. Now then it is seeming right that a woman should have a knife and a battle-bow, and so then take these two signs, you who are to be wise women, of stubborn integrity, of the cross-bow and the knife, that you keep them as sign for you if it pleases you. Now will there then not also be those daughters who wear the jewellery of the star for the diary that is given, and it may be a sign for them, of those who are for integrity and beauty. Now then let the wise women be wise, that they are only an offence to the INCEL, and all men are only able to speak honourably of them, unless they get shame for themselves, for you know that the wise woman does not speak impiousness of a slave, to speak foolishly, for the slaves are gods, and even wise. But if you are seeking wisdom, to be a wise woman, have no offence by the diary or anything I write, for I should not touch you to offend with words if you are enduring to be wise, and indeed let harshness pass away from what I have written for you, for you are not intended to be offended in anything, for if you are for integrity and wisdom, then I am glad because of it, and the books are yours to read. Now nothing of Zion can or should be taken by Babel, for on that day they will smash it, and scatter it, and be a stumbling block to many, for religion is not able to do well, truly, in Babel, and the scholars of them are often not for the appreciation of religion. Now where there is a brutal and cruel man, who is brutal and cruel without cause, that he is hating his wife who is good, and it is ongoing, and not a thing of tragedy or war, or some sickness that has occurred, then indeed there is divorce in the cruelty of it, and she is helpless to have marriage, for it has not been granted to the woman, and he will cast away the certificate of marriage, by Mala, and on land, and free her, and she is helpless to do anything for it, for he hates her, and she has not hated, but been of a faithful spirit. Now then the clouds are in the sky, and the sun shines upon the clouds and it is a matter where there is a departure of two people, and neither are anguished, unless it be the wife of him, that she is anguished, in which case, how can she then be free, that she is not still bound? Now I have not wanted to write anything against women who are women, who are being within the realm of a woman, for who is within the realm of a woman, when she is a woman, indeed she is deserving honour, that she is honourable. Now if society is such that she cannot be beautiful, cannot be honourable in matters of beauty which she would achieve, that it is a brutal and as if violent land, so too is the land for the angel, then, that there must be many wicked in the land.

Now if any woman is put away, and yet is not the wife of a man, indeed there is nothing she can do, and is helpless in it. Now if any man puts his wife away, and she is the true wife of him, he would as if force her to commit adultery.












